Ohio, session 136, SB359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 323.121, 323.132, 323.31, 718.08, 718.27, 718.88, 718.89, 4503.06, 5703.42, 5703.52, 5703.60, 5703.70, 5717.01, 5717.011, 5717.02, 5721.011, 5726.21, 5739.02, 5745.04, 5747.09, 5747.15, 5747.43, and 5751.06 be amended and sections 5703.59, 5717.021, and 5739.125 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 323.121. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of this section, if one-half of the current taxes charged against an entry of real estate together with the full amount of any delinquent taxes are not paid on or before the thirty-first day of December in that year or on or before the last day for payment as extended pursuant to section 323.17 of the Revised Code, a penalty of ten per cent shall be charged against the unpaid balance of such half of the current taxes on the duplicate. If the total amount of all the taxes is not paid on or before the twentieth day of June, next thereafter, or on or before the last day for payment as extended pursuant to section 323.17 of the Revised Code, a like penalty shall be charged on the balance of the total amount of such unpaid current taxes. (2) After a valid delinquent or omitted tax contract that includes unpaid current taxes from a first-half collection period described in section 323.12 of the Revised Code has been entered into under section 323.31 or 5713.20 of the Revised Code, no ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes after the second-half collection period while the delinquent or omitted tax contract remains in effect. On the day a delinquent or omitted tax contract becomes void, the ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes and shall equal the amount of penalty that would have been charged against unpaid current taxes outstanding on the date on which the second-half penalty would have been charged thereon under division (A)(1) of this section if the contract had not been in effect. (B)(1) On the first day of the month following the last day the second installment of taxes may be paid without penalty, interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes other than the current taxes that became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day such second installment could be paid without penalty. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began on the preceding first day of December and ended on the last day of the month that included the last date such second installment could be paid without penalty. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the tax list and duplicate compiled under section 319.28 or 5721.011 of the Revised Code, whichever list and duplicate are first compiled after the date on which the interest is computed and charged. However, for tracts and lots on the real property tax suspension list under section 319.48 of the Revised Code, the interest shall not be entered on the tax list and duplicate compiled under section 319.28 of the Revised Code, but shall be entered on the first tax list and duplicate compiled under section 5721.011 of the Revised Code after the date on which the interest is computed and charged. (2) In a county on behalf of which a county land reutilization corporation has been organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code, upon the written order of the county treasurer, interest shall be charged against and computed on delinquent taxes as provided in division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as prescribed in the order: (a) In the manner provided under divisions (B)(1) and (B)(3) of this section, except that the interest shall be computed at the rate of twelve per cent per annum; or (b) On the first day of the month following the month in which interest otherwise would be charged in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section as specified in the order, and each subsequent month, interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes remaining delinquent on the last day of the preceding month at a rate of one per cent per month. The county treasurer shall file a copy of the order directing the rate and manner of charging interest under this division with the county treasurer and the tax commissioner. If interest is charged under division (B)(2) of this section, interest shall not be charged under division (B)(1) or (3) of this section. (3) On the first day of December, the interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes other than the current taxes that became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day the second installment could be paid without penalty. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began on the first day of the month following the last date prescribed for the payment of the second installment of taxes in the current year and ended on the immediately preceding last day of November. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the tax list and duplicate compiled under section 319.28 or 5721.011 of the Revised Code, whichever list and duplicate are first compiled after the date on which the interest is computed and charged. However, for tracts and lots on the real property tax suspension list under section 319.48 of the Revised Code, the interest shall not be entered on the tax list and duplicate compiled under section 319.28 of the Revised Code, but shall be entered on the first tax list and duplicate compiled under section 5721.011 of the Revised Code after the date on which the interest is computed and charged. (4) After a valid delinquent tax contract has been entered into for the payment of any delinquent taxes, no interest shall be charged against such delinquent taxes while the delinquent tax contract remains in effect in compliance with section 323.31 of the Revised Code. If a valid delinquent tax contract becomes void, interest shall be charged against the delinquent taxes for the periods that interest was not permitted to be charged while the delinquent tax contract was in effect. The interest shall be charged on the day the delinquent tax contract becomes void and shall equal the amount of interest that would have been charged against the unpaid delinquent taxes outstanding on the dates on which interest would have been charged thereon under divisions (B)(1), (2), and (3) of this section had the delinquent tax contract not been in effect. (C) If the full amount of the taxes due at either of the times prescribed by division (A) of this section is paid within ten days after such time, the county treasurer shall waive the collection of and the county auditor shall remit one-half of the penalty provided for in that division for failure to make that payment by the prescribed time. (D) The county treasurer shall compile and deliver to the county auditor a list of all tax payments the treasurer has received as provided in division (C) of this section. The list shall include any information required by the auditor for the remission of the penalties waived by the treasurer. The taxes so collected shall be included in the settlement next succeeding the settlement then in process. Sec. 323.132. If one-half of the current taxes charged against an entry of real estate is not paid on or before the thirty-first day of December of the year for which they are charged or on or before the last day for such payment as extended pursuant to section 323.17 of the Revised Code, that amount, together with the penalty charged under division (A)(1) of section 323.121 of the Revised Code and all delinquent taxes or installment thereof charged against such entry may be paid at any time prior to the date on which tax bills for the second half collection are mailed and delivered, without at the same time requiring payment of the second half of such taxes. If the total amount of such current taxes, delinquent taxes, and all installment payments due under section 323.31 of the Revised Code are not paid on or before the twentieth day of June, next thereafter, or on or before the last day for that payment as extended pursuant to section 323.17 of the Revised Code, the balance of the amount of such taxes, plus all penalties and interest imposed by section 323.121 of the Revised Code, constitutes the delinquent taxes on such entry, which shall be placed on . If any such amounts remain unpaid at the time the delinquent land list and duplicate is compiled pursuant to section 5721.011 of the Revised Code, the unpaid amounts shall be placed on such list and duplicate and shall be collected in the manner prescribed by law, unless the property against which such taxes are charged is the subject of an application for exemption from taxation pursuant to section 5715.27 of the Revised Code. A taxpayer may tender, and the treasurer shall accept, the full amount of delinquent taxes charged against an entry of real estate without having to tender at the same time the payment of any current taxes that are due and payable. A county treasurer may accept partial payments of taxes. Any overpayment shall be refunded by the treasurer in the manner most convenient to the treasurer. When the amount tendered and accepted is less than the amount due, the unpaid balance shall be treated as other unpaid taxes, and, except when the unpaid amount is the penalty or interest and charges on the unpaid taxes, the treasurer shall notify the taxpayer of such deficiency. If the taxpayer files with the payment of taxes a copy of an application to the tax commissioner for remission of penalty, or the payment is received within ten days after the last day the taxes may be paid without penalty, the county treasurer shall accept a partial payment in which the only unpaid amount is the penalty for late payment. If, at any time, and having been provided such documentation as may be found acceptable by the county treasurer, the county treasurer determines that due to a clerical error, a taxpayer has overpaid either the first one-half or second one-half payment of current taxes as charged on the tax list and duplicate, the treasurer may refund the amount of the overpayment to the taxpayer in the manner most convenient to the treasurer. Sec. 323.31. (A)(1) A person who owns agricultural real property or owns and occupies residential An owner of real property or of a manufactured or mobile home that does not have an outstanding tax lien certificate or judgment of foreclosure against it, and a person who is a vendee of such property under a purchase agreement or land contract and who occupies the property, shall have at least one opportunity to pay any delinquent or unpaid current taxes, or both, charged against the property by entering into a written delinquent tax contract with the county treasurer in a form prescribed or approved by the tax commissioner. Subsequent opportunities to enter into a delinquent tax contract shall be at the county treasurer's sole discretion. (2) The treasurer may enter into a delinquent tax contract in accordance with division (A) of this section with an owner or vendee of real property, other than residential real property or a manufactured or mobile home that is occupied by the owner, and other than agricultural real property. (3) The delinquent tax contract described in division (A) of this section may be entered into at any time prior to an adjudication of foreclosure pursuant to proceedings by the county treasurer and the county prosecuting attorney pursuant to section 323.25 or 323.65 to 323.79 of the Revised Code or by the county prosecuting attorney pursuant to section 5721.18 of the Revised Code, the adjudication of foreclosure pursuant to proceedings by a private attorney pursuant to section 5721.37 of the Revised Code, the commencement of foreclosure and forfeiture proceedings pursuant to section 5721.14 of the Revised Code, or the commencement of collection proceedings pursuant to division (H) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code by the filing of a civil action as provided in that division. A duplicate copy of each delinquent tax contract shall be filed with the county auditor, who shall attach the copy to the delinquent land tax certificate, delinquent vacant land tax certificate, or the delinquent manufactured home tax list, or who shall enter an asterisk in the margin next to the entry for the tract or lot on the master list of delinquent tracts, master list of delinquent vacant tracts, or next to the entry for the home on the delinquent manufactured home tax list, prior to filing it with the prosecuting attorney under section 5721.13 of the Revised Code, or, in the case of the delinquent manufactured home tax list, prior to delivering it to the county treasurer under division (H)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code. If the delinquent tax contract is entered into after the certificate or the master list has been filed with the prosecuting attorney, the treasurer shall file the duplicate copy with the prosecuting attorney. (4)(3) A delinquent tax contract entered into under division (A) of this section shall provide for the payment of any delinquent or unpaid current taxes, or both, in installments over a period, beginning on the date of the first payment made under the contract, not to exceed one of the following: (a) Five years for a person entering into a contract on the basis of residential real property the person owns and occupies, except the period shall be not less than two years if the person so requests; (b) Ten years for a person entering into a contract on the basis of a qualifying athletic complex, as defined in section 5709.57 of the Revised Code; (c) Five years for a person entering into a contract on the basis of property other than that described in division (A) (4)(a)(A)(3)(a) or (b) of this section. (5)(4) For each delinquent tax contract entered into under division (A) of this section, the county treasurer shall determine and shall specify in the delinquent tax contract the number of installments, the amount of each installment, and the schedule for payment of the installments. Except as otherwise provided for taxes, penalties, and interest under division (B) of section 319.43 of the Revised Code, the part of each installment payment representing taxes and penalties and interest thereon shall be apportioned among the several taxing districts in the same proportion that the amount of taxes levied by each district against the entry in the preceding tax year bears to the taxes levied by all such districts against the entry in the preceding tax year. The part of each payment representing assessments and other charges shall be credited to those items in the order in which they became due. Each payment made to a taxing district shall be apportioned among the taxing district's several funds for which taxes or assessments have been levied. (6)(5) When an installment payment is not received by the treasurer when due under a delinquent tax contract entered into under division (A) of this section or any current taxes or special assessments charged against the property become unpaid, the delinquent tax contract becomes void unless the treasurer permits a new delinquent tax contract to be entered into; if the treasurer does not permit a new delinquent tax contract to be entered into, the treasurer shall certify to the auditor that the delinquent tax contract has become void. (7)(6) Upon receipt of certification described in division (A)(6)(A)(5) of this section, the auditor shall destroy the duplicate copy of the voided delinquent tax contract. If such copy has been filed with the prosecuting attorney, the auditor immediately shall deliver the certification to the prosecuting attorney, who shall attach it to the appropriate certificate and the duplicate copy of the voided delinquent tax contract or strike through the asterisk entered in the margin of the master list next to the entry for the tract or lot that is the subject of the voided delinquent tax contract. The prosecuting attorney then shall institute a proceeding to foreclose the lien of the state in accordance with section 323.25, sections 323.65 to 323.79, or section 5721.18 of the Revised Code or, in the case of delinquent vacant land, a foreclosure proceeding in accordance with section 323.25, sections 323.65 to 323.79, or section 5721.18 of the Revised Code, or a foreclosure and forfeiture proceeding in accordance with section 5721.14 of the Revised Code. In the case of a manufactured or mobile home, the county treasurer shall cause a civil action to be brought as provided under division (H) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code. (B) If there is an outstanding tax certificate respecting a delinquent parcel under section 5721.32 or 5721.33 of the Revised Code, a written delinquent tax contract may not be entered into under this section. To redeem a tax certificate in installments, the owner or other person seeking to redeem the tax certificate shall enter into a redemption payment plan under division (C) of section 5721.38 of the Revised Code. (C) As used in this section, "unpaid current taxes" means any current taxes charged on the general tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property or the manufactured home tax list and duplicate that remain unpaid after the last day prescribed for payment of the first installment of such taxes without penalty, and any penalties associated with such taxes. Sec. 718.08. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that the taxpayer reasonably estimates to be the taxpayer's tax liability for a municipal corporation's income tax for the current taxable year. (2) "Tax liability" means the total taxes due to a municipal corporation for the taxable year, after allowing any credit to which the taxpayer is entitled, and after applying any estimated tax payment, withholding payment, or credit from another taxable year. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, every taxpayer shall make a declaration of estimated taxes for the current taxable year, on the form prescribed by the tax administrator, if the amount payable as estimated taxes is at least two hundred dollars. For the purposes of this section: (a) Taxes withheld from qualifying wages shall be considered as paid to the municipal corporation for which the taxes were withheld in equal amounts on each payment date unless the taxpayer establishes the dates on which all amounts were actually withheld, in which case the amounts withheld shall be considered as paid on the dates on which the amounts were actually withheld. (b) An overpayment of tax applied as a credit to a subsequent taxable year is deemed to be paid on the date of the postmark stamped on the cover in which the payment is mailed or, if the payment is made by electronic funds transfer, the date the payment is submitted. As used in this division, "date of the postmark" means, in the event there is more than one date on the cover, the earliest date imprinted on the cover by the postal service. (c) Taxes withheld by a casino operator, video lottery sales agent, or type B sports gaming proprietor under section 718.031 of the Revised Code are deemed to be paid to the municipal corporation for which the taxes were withheld on the date the taxes are withheld from the taxpayer's winnings. (2) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, taxpayers filing joint returns shall file joint declarations of estimated taxes. A taxpayer may amend a declaration under rules prescribed by the tax administrator. Except as provided in division (F) of this section, a taxpayer having a taxable year of less than twelve months shall make a declaration under rules prescribed by the tax administrator. (3) The declaration of estimated taxes shall be filed on or before the date prescribed for the filing of municipal income tax returns under division (G) of section 718.05 of the Revised Code or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the taxpayer becomes subject to tax for the first time. (4) Taxpayers reporting on a fiscal year basis shall file a declaration on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of each fiscal year or period. (5) The original declaration or any subsequent amendment may be increased or decreased on or before any subsequent quarterly payment day as provided in this section. (C)(1) The required portion of the tax liability for the taxable year that shall be paid through estimated taxes made payable to the municipal corporation or tax administrator, including the application of tax refunds to estimated taxes and withholding on or before the applicable payment date, shall be as follows: (a) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (b) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the taxable year, forty-five per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (c) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (d) For an individual, on or before the fifteenth day of the first month of the following taxable year, ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year. For a person other than an individual, on or before the fifteenth day of the twelfth month of the taxable year, ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year. (2) When an amended declaration has been filed, the unpaid balance shown due on the amended declaration shall be paid in equal installments on or before the remaining payment dates. (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month of the year following that for which the declaration or amended declaration was filed, an annual return shall be filed and any balance which may be due shall be paid with the return in accordance with section 718.05 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) In the case of any underpayment of any portion of a tax liability, penalty and interest may be imposed pursuant to section 718.27 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (E) of this section. The amount of the underpayment shall be determined as follows: (a) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (b) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, forty-five per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (c) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (d) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, ninety per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. (2) The period of the underpayment shall run from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the date on which the payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently required to be paid to avoid any penalty. (E) An underpayment of any portion of tax liability determined under division (D) of this section shall be due to reasonable cause and the penalty imposed by this section shall not be added to the taxes for the taxable year if any of the following apply: (1) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during the year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due. (2) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the taxpayer filed a return with the municipal corporation under section 718.05 of the Revised Code for that year. (3) The taxpayer is an individual who resides in the municipal corporation but was not domiciled there on the first day of January of the calendar year that includes the first day of the taxable year. (4) The taxpayer has not underpaid estimated taxes in any preceding taxable year. (F)(1) A tax administrator may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of taxpayers after finding that the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. (2) A municipal corporation may, by ordinance or rule, waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for all taxpayers. Sec. 718.27. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Applicable law" means this chapter, the resolutions, ordinances, codes, directives, instructions, and rules adopted by a municipal corporation provided such resolutions, ordinances, codes, directives, instructions, and rules impose or directly or indirectly address the levy, payment, remittance, or filing requirements of a municipal income tax. (2) "Income tax," "estimated income tax," and "withholding tax" means any income tax, estimated income tax, and withholding tax imposed by a municipal corporation pursuant to applicable law, including at any time before January 1, 2016. (3) A "return" includes any tax return, report, reconciliation, schedule, and other document required to be filed with a tax administrator or municipal corporation by a taxpayer, employer, any agent of the employer, or any other payer pursuant to applicable law, including at any time before January 1, 2016. (4) "Federal short-term rate" means the rate of the average market yield on outstanding marketable obligations of the United States with remaining periods to maturity of three years or less, as determined under section 1274 of the Internal Revenue Code, for July of the current year. (5) "Interest rate as described in division (A) of this section" means the federal short-term rate, rounded to the nearest whole number per cent, plus five per cent. The rate shall apply for the calendar year next following the July of the year in which the federal short-term rate is determined in accordance with division (A)(4) of this section. (6) "Unpaid estimated income tax" means estimated income tax due but not paid by the date the tax is required to be paid under applicable law. (7) "Unpaid income tax" means income tax due but not paid by the date the income tax is required to be paid under applicable law. (8) "Unpaid withholding tax" means withholding tax due but not paid by the date the withholding tax is required to be paid under applicable law. (9) "Withholding tax" includes amounts an employer, any agent of an employer, or any other payer did not withhold in whole or in part from an employee's qualifying wages, but that, under applicable law, the employer, agent, or other payer is required to withhold from an employee's qualifying wages. (B)(1) This section applies to the following: (a) Any return required to be filed under applicable law for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016; (b) Income tax, estimated income tax, and withholding tax required to be paid or remitted to the municipal corporation on or after January 1, 2016. (2) This section does not apply to returns required to be filed or payments required to be made before January 1, 2016, regardless of the filing or payment date. Returns required to be filed or payments required to be made before January 1, 2016, but filed or paid after that date shall be subject to the ordinances or rules, as adopted before January 1, 2016, of the municipal corporation to which the return is to be filed or the payment is to be made. (C) Each municipal corporation levying a tax on income may impose on a taxpayer, employer, any agent of the employer, and any other payer, and must attempt to collect, the interest amounts and penalties prescribed under division (C) of this section when the taxpayer, employer, any agent of the employer, or any other payer for any reason fails, in whole or in part, to make to the municipal corporation timely and full payment or remittance of income tax, estimated income tax, or withholding tax or to file timely with the municipal corporation any return required to be filed. (1) Interest shall be imposed at the rate described in division (A) of this section, per annum, on all unpaid income tax, unpaid estimated income tax, and unpaid withholding tax. (2)(a) With respect to unpaid income tax and unpaid estimated income tax, a municipal corporation may impose a penalty equal to fifteen per cent of the amount not timely paid. (b) With respect to any unpaid withholding tax, a municipal corporation may impose a penalty not exceeding fifty per cent of the amount not timely paid. (3) With respect to returns other than estimated income tax returns, a municipal corporation may impose a penalty not exceeding twenty-five dollars for each failure to timely file each return, regardless of the liability shown thereon, except that a municipal corporation shall abate or refund the penalty assessed on a taxpayer's first failure to timely file a return after the taxpayer files that return. (D)(1) With respect to the income taxes, estimated income taxes, withholding taxes, and returns, no municipal corporation shall impose, seek to collect, or collect any penalty, amount of interest, charges, or additional fees not described in this section. (2) With respect to the income taxes, estimated income taxes, withholding taxes, and returns not described in division (A) of this section, nothing in this section requires a municipal corporation to refund or credit any penalty, amount of interest, charges, or additional fees that the municipal corporation has properly imposed or collected before January 1, 2016. (E) Nothing in this section limits the authority of a municipal corporation to abate or partially abate penalties or interest imposed under this section when the tax administrator determines, in the tax administrator's sole discretion, that such abatement is appropriate. (F) By the thirty-first day of October of each year the municipal corporation shall publish the rate described in division (A) of this section applicable to the next succeeding calendar year. (G) The municipal corporation may impose on the taxpayer, employer, any agent of the employer, or any other payer the municipal corporation's post-judgment collection costs and fees, including attorney's fees. (H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or chapter, the municipal corporation shall not impose any penalty or interest under this chapter for the failure to file a return or report if no amount of tax is due with the return or report. Sec. 718.88. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Combined tax liability" means the total amount of a taxpayer's income tax liabilities to all municipal corporations in this state for a taxable year. (2) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that the taxpayer reasonably estimates to be the taxpayer's combined tax liability for the current taxable year. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, every taxpayer shall make a declaration of estimated taxes for the current taxable year, on the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, if the amount payable as estimated taxes is at least two hundred dollars. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, a taxpayer having a taxable year of less than twelve months shall make a declaration under rules prescribed by the commissioner. (3) The declaration of estimated taxes shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the taxpayer becomes subject to tax for the first time. (4) The tax commissioner may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of taxpayers after finding that the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. (C) Each taxpayer shall file the declaration of estimated taxes with, and remit estimated taxes to, the tax commissioner at the times and in the amounts prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section. Remitted taxes shall be made payable to the treasurer of state. (1) The required portion of the combined tax liability for the taxable year that shall be paid through estimated taxes shall be as follows: (a) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year; (b) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the taxable year, forty-five per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year; (c) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year; (d) On or before the fifteenth day of the twelfth month of the taxable year, ninety per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year. (2) If the taxpayer determines that its declaration of estimated taxes will not accurately reflect the taxpayer's tax liability for the taxable year, the taxpayer shall increase or decrease, as appropriate, its subsequent payments in equal installments to result in a more accurate payment of estimated taxes. (3)(a) Each taxpayer shall report on the declaration of estimated taxes the portion of the remittance that the taxpayer estimates that it owes to each municipal corporation for the taxable year. (b) Upon receiving a payment of estimated taxes under this section, the commissioner shall immediately forward the payment to the treasurer of state. The treasurer shall credit the payment in the same manner as in division (B) of section 718.85 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) In the case of any underpayment of estimated taxes, the tax commissioner may add to the taxes an amount determined at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (E) of this section. The amount of the underpayment shall be determined as follows: (a) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (b) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, forty-five per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (c) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (d) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, ninety per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. (2) The period of the underpayment shall run from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the date on which the payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently due. (3) All amounts collected under this section shall be considered as taxes collected under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code and shall be credited and distributed to municipal corporations in accordance with section 718.83 of the Revised Code. (E) An underpayment of any portion of a combined tax liability shall be due to reasonable cause and the penalty imposed by this section shall not be added to the taxes for the taxable year if any of the following apply: (1) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least ninety per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during the year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due. (2) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the taxpayer filed a municipal income tax return for that year. (3) The taxpayer has not underpaid estimated taxes in any preceding taxable year. Sec. 718.89. (A) In addition to any other penalty imposed by sections 718.80 to 718.95 or Chapter 5703. of the Revised Code, the following penalties shall apply: (1) If a taxpayer required to file a tax return under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code fails to make and file the return within the time prescribed, including any extensions of time granted by the tax commissioner, the commissioner may impose a penalty not exceeding twenty-five dollars, except that the commissioner shall abate or refund the penalty assessed on a taxpayer's first failure to timely file a return after the taxpayer files that return. (2) If a person required to file a tax return electronically under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code fails to do so, the commissioner may impose a penalty not to exceed the following: (a) For each of the first two failures, five per cent of the amount required to be reported on the return; (b) For the third and any subsequent failure, ten per cent of the amount required to be reported on the return. (3) If a taxpayer that has made the election allowed under section 718.80 of the Revised Code fails to timely pay an amount of tax required to be paid under this chapter, the commissioner may impose a penalty equal to fifteen per cent of the amount not timely paid. (4) If a taxpayer files what purports to be a tax return required by sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code that does not contain information upon which the substantial correctness of the return may be judged or contains information that on its face indicates that the return is substantially incorrect, and the filing of the return in that manner is due to a position that is frivolous or a desire that is apparent from the return to delay or impede the administration of sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code, a penalty of up to five hundred dollars may be imposed. (5) If a taxpayer makes a fraudulent attempt to evade the reporting or payment of the tax required to be shown on any return required under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of one thousand dollars or one hundred per cent of the tax required to be shown on the return. (6) If any person makes a false or fraudulent claim for a refund under section 718.91 of the Revised Code, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of one thousand dollars or one hundred per cent of the claim. Any penalty imposed under this division, any refund issued on the claim, and interest on any refund from the date of the refund, may be assessed under section 718.90 of the Revised Code without regard to any time limitation for the assessment imposed by division (A) of that section. (B) For purposes of this section, the tax required to be shown on a tax return shall be reduced by the amount of any part of the tax paid on or before the date, including any extensions of the date, prescribed for filing the return. (C) Each penalty imposed under this section shall be in addition to any other penalty imposed under this section. All or part of any penalty imposed under this section may be abated by the tax commissioner. The commissioner may adopt rules governing the imposition and abatement of such penalties. (D) All amounts collected under this section shall be considered as taxes collected under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code and shall be credited and distributed to municipal corporations in the same proportion as the underlying tax liability is required to be distributed to such municipal corporations under section 718.83 of the Revised Code. (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall not impose any penalty or interest under those sections for the failure to file a return or report if no amount of tax is due with the return or report. Sec. 4503.06. (A) The owner of each manufactured or mobile home that has acquired situs in this state shall pay either a real property tax pursuant to Title LVII of the Revised Code or a manufactured home tax pursuant to division (C) of this section. (B) The owner of a manufactured or mobile home shall pay real property taxes if either of the following applies: (1) The manufactured or mobile home acquired situs in the state or ownership in the home was transferred on or after January 1, 2000, and all of the following apply: (a) The home is affixed to a permanent foundation as defined in division (C)(5) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (b) The home is located on land that is owned by the owner of the home. (c) The certificate of title has been inactivated by the clerk of the court of common pleas that issued it, pursuant to division (H) of section 4505.11 of the Revised Code. (2) The manufactured or mobile home acquired situs in the state or ownership in the home was transferred before January 1, 2000, and all of the following apply: (a) The home is affixed to a permanent foundation as defined in division (C)(5) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (b) The home is located on land that is owned by the owner of the home. (c) The owner of the home has elected to have the home taxed as real property and, pursuant to section 4505.11 of the Revised Code, has surrendered the certificate of title to the auditor of the county containing the taxing district in which the home has its situs, together with proof that all taxes have been paid. (d) The county auditor has placed the home on the real property tax list and delivered the certificate of title to the clerk of the court of common pleas that issued it and the clerk has inactivated the certificate. (C)(1) Any mobile or manufactured home that is not taxed as real property as provided in division (B) of this section is subject to an annual manufactured home tax, payable by the owner, for locating the home in this state. The tax as levied in this section is for the purpose of supplementing the general revenue funds of the local subdivisions in which the home has its situs pursuant to this section. (2) The year for which the manufactured home tax is levied commences on the first day of January and ends on the following thirty-first day of December. The state shall have the first lien on any manufactured or mobile home on the list for the amount of taxes, penalties, and interest charged against the owner of the home under this section. The lien of the state for the tax for a year shall attach on the first day of January to a home that has acquired situs on that date. The lien for a home that has not acquired situs on the first day of January, but that acquires situs during the year, shall attach on the next first day of January. The lien shall continue until the tax, including any penalty or interest, is paid. (3)(a) The situs of a manufactured or mobile home located in this state on the first day of January is the local taxing district in which the home is located on that date. (b) The situs of a manufactured or mobile home not located in this state on the first day of January, but located in this state subsequent to that date, is the local taxing district in which the home is located thirty days after it is acquired or first enters this state. (4) The tax is collected by and paid to the county treasurer of the county containing the taxing district in which the home has its situs. (D) The manufactured home tax shall be computed and assessed by the county auditor of the county containing the taxing district in which the home has its situs as follows: (1) On a home that acquired situs in this state prior to January 1, 2000: (a) By multiplying the assessable value of the home by the tax rate of the taxing district in which the home has its situs, and deducting from the product thus obtained any reduction authorized under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code. The tax levied under this formula shall not be less than thirty-six dollars, unless the home qualifies for a reduction in assessable value under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code, in which case there shall be no minimum tax and the tax shall be the amount calculated under this division. (b) The assessable value of the home shall be forty per cent of the amount arrived at by the following computation: (i) If the cost to the owner, or market value at time of purchase, whichever is greater, of the home includes the furnishings and equipment, such cost or market value shall be multiplied according to the following schedule: 1 2 3 A For the first calendar year in which the home is owned by the current owner x 80% B 2nd calendar year x 75% C 3rd " x 70% D 4th " x 65% E 5th " x 60% F 6th " x 55% G 7th " x 50% H 8th " x 45% I 9th " x 40% J 10th and each year thereafter x 35% The first calendar year means any period between the first day of January and the thirty-first day of December of the first year. (ii) If the cost to the owner, or market value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, of the home does not include the furnishings and equipment, such cost or market value shall be multiplied according to the following schedule: 1 2 3 A For the first calendar year in which the home is owned by the current owner x 95% B 2nd calendar year x 90% C 3rd " x 85% D 4th " x 80% E 5th " x 75% F 6th " x 70% G 7th " x 65% H 8th " x 60% I 9th " x 55% J 10th and each year thereafter x 50% The first calendar year means any period between the first day of January and the thirty-first day of December of the first year. (2) On a home in which ownership was transferred or that first acquired situs in this state on or after January 1, 2000: (a) By multiplying the assessable value of the home by the effective tax rate, as defined in section 323.08 of the Revised Code, for residential real property of the taxing district in which the home has its situs, and deducting from the product thus obtained the reductions required or authorized under section 319.302, 319.303, 319.304, or 4503.065 or division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (b) The assessable value of the home shall be thirty-five per cent of its true value as determined under division (L) of this section. (3) On or before the fifteenth day of January each year, the county auditor shall record the assessable value and the amount of tax on the manufactured or mobile home on the tax list and deliver a duplicate of the list to the county treasurer. In the case of an emergency as defined in section 323.17 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner, by journal entry, may extend the times for delivery of the duplicate for an additional fifteen days upon receiving a written application from the county auditor regarding an extension for the delivery of the duplicate, or from the county treasurer regarding an extension of the time for the billing and collection of taxes. The application shall contain a statement describing the emergency that will cause the unavoidable delay and must be received by the tax commissioner on or before the last day of the month preceding the day delivery of the duplicate is otherwise required. When an extension is granted for delivery of the duplicate, the time period for payment of taxes shall be extended for a like period of time. When a delay in the closing of a tax collection period becomes unavoidable, the tax commissioner, upon application by the county auditor and county treasurer, may order the time for payment of taxes to be extended if the tax commissioner determines that penalties have accrued or would otherwise accrue for reasons beyond the control of the taxpayers of the county. The order shall prescribe the final extended date for payment of taxes for that collection period. (4) After January 1, 1999, the owner of a manufactured or mobile home taxed pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section may elect to have the home taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section by filing a written request with the county auditor of the taxing district in which the home is located on or before the first day of December of any year. Upon the filing of the request, the county auditor shall determine whether all taxes levied under division (D)(1) of this section have been paid, and if those taxes have been paid, the county auditor shall tax the manufactured or mobile home pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section commencing in the next tax year. (5) A manufactured or mobile home that acquired situs in this state prior to January 1, 2000, shall be taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section if no manufactured home tax had been paid for the home and the home was not exempted from taxation pursuant to division (E) of this section for the year for which the taxes were not paid. (6)(a) Immediately upon receipt of any manufactured home tax duplicate from the county auditor, but not less than twenty days prior to the last date on which the first one-half taxes may be paid without penalty as prescribed in division (F) of this section, the county treasurer shall cause to be prepared and mailed or delivered to each person charged on that duplicate with taxes, or to an agent designated by such person, the tax bill prescribed by the tax commissioner under division (D)(7) of this section. When taxes are paid by installments, the county treasurer shall mail or deliver to each person charged on such duplicate or the agent designated by that person a second tax bill showing the amount due at the time of the second tax collection. The second half tax bill shall be mailed or delivered at least twenty days prior to the close of the second half tax collection period. A change in the mailing address, electronic mail address, or telephone number of any tax bill shall be made in writing to the county treasurer. Failure to receive a bill required by this section does not excuse failure or delay to pay any taxes shown on the bill or, except as provided in division (B)(1) of section 5715.39 of the Revised Code, avoid any penalty, interest, or charge for such delay. A policy adopted by a county treasurer under division (A)(2) of section 323.13 of the Revised Code shall also allow any person required to receive a tax bill under division (D)(6)(a) of this section to request electronic delivery of that tax bill in the same manner. A person may rescind such a request in the same manner as a request made under division (A)(2) of section 323.13 of the Revised Code. The request shall terminate upon a change in the name of the person charged with the taxes pursuant to section 4503.061 of the Revised Code. (b) After delivery of the copy of the delinquent manufactured home tax list under division (H) of this section, the county treasurer may prepare and mail to each person in whose name a home is listed an additional tax bill showing the total amount of delinquent taxes charged against the home as shown on the list. The tax bill shall include a notice that the interest charge prescribed by division (G) of this section has begun to accrue. (7) Each tax bill prepared and mailed or delivered under division (D)(6) of this section shall be in the form and contain the information required by the tax commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe different forms for each county and may authorize the county auditor to make up tax bills and tax receipts to be used by the county treasurer. The tax bill shall not contain or be mailed or delivered with any information or material that is not required by this section or that is not authorized by section 321.45 of the Revised Code or by the tax commissioner. In addition to the information required by the commissioner, each tax bill shall contain the following information: (a) The taxes levied and the taxes charged and payable against the manufactured or mobile home; (b) The following notice: "Notice: If the taxes are not paid within sixty days after the county auditor delivers the delinquent manufactured home tax list to the county treasurer, you and your home may be subject to collection proceedings for tax delinquency." Failure to provide such notice has no effect upon the validity of any tax judgment to which a home may be subjected. (c) In the case of manufactured or mobile homes taxed under division (D)(2) of this section, the following additional information: (i) The effective tax rate. The words "effective tax rate" shall appear in boldface type. (ii) The following notice: "Notice: If the taxes charged against this home have been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction for residences occupied by the owner but the home is not a residence occupied by the owner, the owner must notify the county auditor's office not later than March 31 of the year for which the taxes are due. Failure to do so may result in the owner being convicted of a fourth degree misdemeanor, which is punishable by imprisonment up to 30 days, a fine up to $250, or both, and in the owner having to repay the amount by which the taxes were erroneously or illegally reduced, plus any interest that may apply. If the taxes charged against this home have not been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction and the home is a residence occupied by the owner, the home may qualify for the tax reduction. To obtain an application for the tax reduction or further information, the owner may contact the county auditor's office at __________ (insert the address and telephone number of the county auditor's office)." (E)(1) A manufactured or mobile home is not subject to this section when any of the following applies: (a) It is taxable as personal property pursuant to section 5709.01 of the Revised Code. Any manufactured or mobile home that is used as a residence shall be subject to this section and shall not be taxable as personal property pursuant to section 5709.01 of the Revised Code. (b) It bears a license plate issued by any state other than this state unless the home is in this state in excess of an accumulative period of thirty days in any calendar year. (c) The annual tax has been paid on the home in this state for the current year. (d) The tax commissioner has determined, pursuant to section 5715.27 of the Revised Code, that the property is exempt from taxation, or would be exempt from taxation under Chapter 5709. of the Revised Code if it were classified as real property. (2) A travel trailer or park trailer, as these terms are defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, is not subject to this section if it is unused or unoccupied and stored at the owner's normal place of residence or at a recognized storage facility. (3) A travel trailer or park trailer, as these terms are defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, is subject to this section and shall be taxed as a manufactured or mobile home if it has a situs longer than thirty days in one location and is connected to existing utilities, unless either of the following applies: (a) The situs is in a state facility or a camping or park area as defined in division (C), (Q), (S), or (V) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code. (b) The situs is in a camping or park area that is a tract of land that has been limited to recreational use by deed or zoning restrictions and subdivided for sale of five or more individual lots for the express or implied purpose of occupancy by either self-contained recreational vehicles as defined in division (T) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code or by dependent recreational vehicles as defined in division (D) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code. (F) Except as provided in division (D)(3) of this section, the manufactured home tax is due and payable as follows: (1) When a manufactured or mobile home has a situs in this state, as provided in this section, on the first day of January, one-half of the amount of the tax is due and payable on or before the first day of March and the balance is due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of July. At the option of the owner of the home, the tax for the entire year may be paid in full on the first day of March. (2) When a manufactured or mobile home first acquires a situs in this state after the first day of January, no tax is due and payable for that year. (G)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(b) of this section, if one-half of the current taxes charged under this section against a manufactured or mobile home, together with the full amount of any delinquent taxes, are not paid on or before the first day of March in that year, or on or before the last day for such payment as extended pursuant to section 4503.063 of the Revised Code, a penalty of ten per cent shall be charged against the unpaid balance of such half of the current taxes. If the total amount of all such taxes is not paid on or before the thirty-first day of July, next thereafter, or on or before the last day for payment as extended pursuant to section 4503.063 of the Revised Code, a like penalty shall be charged on the balance of the total amount of the unpaid current taxes. (b) After a valid delinquent tax contract that includes unpaid current taxes from a first-half collection period described in division (F) of this section has been entered into under section 323.31 of the Revised Code, no ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes after the second-half collection period while the delinquent tax contract remains in effect. On the day a delinquent tax contract becomes void, the ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes and shall equal the amount of penalty that would have been charged against unpaid current taxes outstanding on the date on which the second-half penalty would have been charged thereon under division (G)(1)(a) of this section if the contract had not been in effect. (2)(a) On the first day of the month following the last day the second installment of taxes may be paid without penalty beginning in 2000, interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes other than the current taxes that became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day such second installment could be paid without penalty. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began on the preceding first day of December and ended on the last day of the month that included the last date such second installment could be paid without penalty. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the delinquent manufactured home tax list compiled under division (H) of this section. (b) On the first day of December beginning in 2000, the interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes other than the current taxes that became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day the second installment could be paid without penalty. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began on the first day of the month following the last date prescribed for the payment of the second installment of taxes in the current year and ended on the immediately preceding last day of November. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the delinquent manufactured home tax list. (c) After a valid undertaking has been entered into for the payment of any delinquent taxes, no interest shall be charged against such delinquent taxes while the undertaking remains in effect in compliance with section 323.31 of the Revised Code. If a valid undertaking becomes void, interest shall be charged against the delinquent taxes for the periods that interest was not permitted to be charged while the undertaking was in effect. The interest shall be charged on the day the undertaking becomes void and shall equal the amount of interest that would have been charged against the unpaid delinquent taxes outstanding on the dates on which interest would have been charged thereon under divisions (G)(1) and (2) of this section had the undertaking not been in effect. (3) If the full amount of the taxes due at either of the times prescribed by division (F) of this section is paid within ten days after such time, the county treasurer shall waive the collection of and the county auditor shall remit one-half of the penalty provided for in this division for failure to make that payment by the prescribed time. (4) The treasurer shall compile and deliver to the county auditor a list of all tax payments the treasurer has received as provided in division (G)(3) of this section. The list shall include any information required by the auditor for the remission of the penalties waived by the treasurer. The taxes so collected shall be included in the settlement next succeeding the settlement then in process. (H)(1) The No sooner than six months after the settlement under division (H)(2) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall compile annually a "delinquent manufactured home tax list" consisting of homes the county treasurer's records indicate have taxes that were not paid within the time prescribed by divisions (D)(3) and (F) of this section and that remain unpaid, have taxes that remain unpaid from prior years, or have unpaid tax penalties or interest that have been assessed. (2) Within thirty days after the settlement under division (H)(2) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, the The county auditor shall deliver a copy of the delinquent manufactured home tax list to the county treasurer. The auditor shall update and publish the delinquent manufactured home tax list annually in the same manner as delinquent real property tax lists are published. The county auditor may apportion the cost of publishing the list among taxing districts in proportion to the amount of delinquent manufactured home taxes so published that each taxing district is entitled to receive upon collection of those taxes, or the county auditor may charge the owner of a home on the list a flat fee established under section 319.54 of the Revised Code for the cost of publishing the list and, if the fee is not paid, may place the fee upon the delinquent manufactured home tax list as a lien on the listed home, to be collected as other manufactured home taxes. (3) When taxes, penalties, or interest are charged against a person on the delinquent manufactured home tax list and are not paid within sixty days after the list is delivered to the county treasurer, the county treasurer shall, in addition to any other remedy provided by law for the collection of taxes, penalties, and interest, enforce collection of such taxes, penalties, and interest by civil action in the name of the treasurer against the owner for the recovery of the unpaid taxes following the procedures for the recovery of delinquent real property taxes in sections 323.25 to 323.28 of the Revised Code. The action may be brought in municipal or county court, provided the amount charged does not exceed the monetary limitations for original jurisdiction for civil actions in those courts. It is sufficient, having made proper parties to the suit, for the county treasurer to allege in the treasurer's bill of particulars or petition that the taxes stand chargeable on the books of the county treasurer against such person, that they are due and unpaid, and that such person is indebted in the amount of taxes appearing to be due the county. The treasurer need not set forth any other matter relating thereto. If it is found on the trial of the action that the person is indebted to the state, judgment shall be rendered in favor of the county treasurer prosecuting the action. The judgment debtor is not entitled to the benefit of any law for stay of execution or exemption of property from levy or sale on execution in the enforcement of the judgment. Upon the filing of an entry of confirmation of sale or an order of forfeiture in a proceeding brought under this division, title to the manufactured or mobile home shall be in the purchaser. The clerk of courts shall issue a certificate of title to the purchaser upon presentation of proof of filing of the entry of confirmation or order and, in the case of a forfeiture, presentation of the county auditor's certificate of sale. (I) The total amount of taxes collected shall be distributed in the following manner: four per cent shall be allowed as compensation to the county auditor for the county auditor's service in assessing the taxes; two per cent shall be allowed as compensation to the county treasurer for the services the county treasurer renders as a result of the tax levied by this section. Such amounts shall be paid into the county treasury, to the credit of the county general revenue fund, on the warrant of the county auditor. Fees to be paid to the credit of the real estate assessment fund shall be collected pursuant to division (C) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code and paid into the county treasury, on the warrant of the county auditor. The balance of the taxes collected shall be distributed among the taxing subdivisions of the county in which the taxes are collected and paid in the same proportions that the amount of manufactured home tax levied by each taxing subdivision of the county in the current tax year bears to the amount of such tax levied by all such subdivisions in the county in the current tax year. The taxes levied and revenues collected under this section shall be in lieu of any general property tax and any tax levied with respect to the privilege of using or occupying a manufactured or mobile home in this state except as provided in sections 4503.04 and 5741.02 of the Revised Code. (J) An agreement to purchase or a bill of sale for a manufactured home shall show whether or not the furnishings and equipment are included in the purchase price. (K) If the county treasurer and the county prosecuting attorney agree that an item charged on the delinquent manufactured home tax list is uncollectible, they shall certify that determination and the reasons to the county board of revision. If the board determines the amount is uncollectible, it shall certify its determination to the county auditor, who shall strike the item from the list. (L)(1) The county auditor shall appraise at its true value any manufactured or mobile home in which ownership is transferred or which first acquires situs in this state on or after January 1, 2000, and any manufactured or mobile home the owner of which has elected, under division (D)(4) of this section, to have the home taxed under division (D)(2) of this section. The true value shall include the value of the home, any additions, and any fixtures, but not any furnishings in the home. In determining the true value of a manufactured or mobile home, the auditor shall consider all facts and circumstances relating to the value of the home, including its age, its capacity to function as a residence, any obsolete characteristics, and other factors that may tend to prove its true value. (2)(a) If a manufactured or mobile home has been the subject of an arm's length sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer within a reasonable length of time prior to the determination of true value, the county auditor shall consider the sale price of the home to be the true value for taxation purposes. (b) The sale price in an arm's length transaction between a willing seller and a willing buyer shall not be considered the true value of the home if either of the following occurred after the sale: (i) The home has lost value due to a casualty. (ii) An addition or fixture has been added to the home. (3) The county auditor shall have each home viewed and appraised at least once in each six-year period in the same year in which real property in the county is appraised pursuant to Chapter 5713. of the Revised Code, and shall update the appraised values in the third calendar year following the appraisal. The person viewing or appraising a home may enter the home to determine by actual view any additions or fixtures that have been added since the last appraisal. In conducting the appraisals and establishing the true value, the auditor shall follow the procedures set forth for appraising real property in sections 5713.01 and 5713.03 of the Revised Code. (4) The county auditor shall place the true value of each home on the manufactured home tax list upon completion of an appraisal. (5)(a) If the county auditor changes the true value of a home, the auditor shall notify the owner of the home in writing, delivered by mail or in person. The notice shall be given at least thirty days prior to the issuance of any tax bill that reflects the change. Failure to receive the notice does not invalidate any proceeding under this section. (b) Any owner of a home or any other person or party that would be authorized to file a complaint under division (A) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code if the home was real property may file a complaint against the true value of the home as appraised under this section. The complaint shall be filed with the county auditor on or before the thirty-first day of March of the current tax year or the date of closing of the collection for the first half of manufactured home taxes for the current tax year, whichever is later. The auditor shall present to the county board of revision all complaints filed with the auditor under this section. The board shall hear and investigate the complaint and may take action on it as provided under sections 5715.11 to 5715.19 of the Revised Code. (c) If the county board of revision determines, pursuant to a complaint against the valuation of a manufactured or mobile home filed under this section, that the amount of taxes, assessments, or other charges paid was in excess of the amount due based on the valuation as finally determined, then the overpayment shall be refunded in the manner prescribed in section 5715.22 of the Revised Code. (d) Payment of all or part of a tax under this section for any year for which a complaint is pending before the county board of revision does not abate the complaint or in any way affect the hearing and determination thereof. (M) If the county auditor determines that any tax or other charge or any part thereof has been erroneously charged as a result of a clerical error as defined in section 319.35 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall call the attention of the county board of revision to the erroneous charges. If the board finds that the taxes or other charges have been erroneously charged or collected, it shall certify the finding to the auditor. Upon receipt of the certification, the auditor shall remove the erroneous charges on the manufactured home tax list or delinquent manufactured home tax list in the same manner as is prescribed in section 319.35 of the Revised Code for erroneous charges against real property, and refund any erroneous charges that have been collected, with interest, in the same manner as is prescribed in section 319.36 of the Revised Code for erroneous charges against real property. (N) As used in this section and section 4503.061 of the Revised Code: (1) "Manufactured home taxes" includes taxes, penalties, and interest charged under division (C) or (G) of this section and any penalties charged under division (G) or (H)(5) of section 4503.061 of the Revised Code. (2) "Current taxes" means all manufactured home taxes charged against a manufactured or mobile home that have not appeared on the manufactured home tax list for any prior year. Current taxes become delinquent taxes if they remain unpaid after the last day prescribed for payment of the second installment of current taxes without penalty, whether or not they have been certified delinquent. (3) "Delinquent taxes" means: (a) Any manufactured home taxes that were charged against a manufactured or mobile home for a prior year, including any penalties or interest charged for a prior year and the costs of publication under division (H)(2) of this section, and that remain unpaid; (b) Any current manufactured home taxes charged against a manufactured or mobile home that remain unpaid after the last day prescribed for payment of the second installment of current taxes without penalty, whether or not they have been certified delinquent, including any penalties or interest and the costs of publication under division (H)(2) of this section. Sec. 5703.42. The annual report of the department of taxation shall include a full report of the operation and execution of all laws which it is required to administer. The department shall deliver copies of the report to each member of the general assembly. Sec. 5703.52. (A) The tax commissioner shall appoint one or more problem resolution officers from among the employees of the department of taxation, and at least one of these employees shall be assigned as a problem resolution officer as the employee's full-time duty. These officers shall receive and review inquiries and complaints concerning matters that have been pending before the department for an unreasonable length of time or matters to which a taxpayer has been unable to obtain a satisfactory response after several attempts to communicate with the employee of the department assigned to the taxpayer's case or the employee's immediate supervisor. Matters arising in cases on appeal from a final determination of the commissioner or in cases certified to the attorney general for collection are not reviewable by a problem resolution officer. An action taken by a problem resolution officer is not a final order of the commissioner appealable to the board of tax appeals. The commissioner shall prescribe and make available on the department of taxation's web site a form, that may be submitted online through the department's web site, to request assistance from or otherwise communicate with a problem resolution officer. The form shall be available from a link on the home page of the department's web site. Upon receipt of such a form, the officer shall transmit a copy of the form to any employee of the department involved in the matter listed on the form. The home page of the department's web site shall include a link that leads to a directory of each employee appointed as a problem resolution officer, including the name, phone number, and electronic mail address of the employee. The directory shall also indicate if an employee is assigned as a problem resolution officer as the employee's full-time duty. This information shall be updated as needed. If a person registers to receive regular communication or updates from the department, this information shall be included in such a communication to the person. If any of the information changes, it shall be included in another communication. (B) The tax commissioner shall maintain a continuing education program to train employees of the department and to provide them with a current knowledge of state and federal tax laws. (C) In addition to any other information provided by law, the tax commissioner shall include in the annual report required by section 5703.42 of the Revised Code information all of the following, arranged by tax and whether the taxpayer involved is an individual or a business: (1) Information about the number and kinds of audits or assessments conducted in the year covered by the report. (2) The length of time of such audits, which may be compiled into statistics. (3) The length of time to resolve appeals, which may be compiled into statistics. (4) The number of audits that remained unresolved as of the last day of the year covered by the report. Of those audits, the report shall indicate whether each had been unresolved for less than one year, more than one year but less than two years, more than two years but less than three years, or four years or more. (5) The number of appeals with respect to which a taxpayer has filed a petition for reassessment or request for hearing but that, as of the last day of the year covered by the report, have have not resulted in a final determination. Of those appeals, the report shall indicate whether each had been unresolved for less than one year, more than one year but less than two years, more than two years but less than three years, or four years or more. (D) The tax commissioner shall not use the amounts of taxes assessed by an employee of the department as the basis of a production quota system for employees or the basis for evaluating an employee's performance. (E) The tax commissioner shall establish procedures for monitoring the performance of tax agents that include the use of evaluations obtained from taxpayers. Sec. 5703.59. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Taxpayer" and "tax or fee" have the same meanings as in section 5703.77 of the Revised Code. (2) "Notice of assessment" means a notice of underpayment or nonpayment of a tax or fee issued pursuant to any section of the Revised Code, including under section 5736.09, 5739.13, 5741.11, 5741.13, 5747.13, or 5751.09 of the Revised Code. (B) A taxpayer shall have at least one opportunity to pay the amount of any tax or fee, including related charges, penalties, and interest, for which a notice of assessment has been issued but that has not been certified to the attorney general under section 131.02 of the Revised Code by entering into a written delinquent tax contract with the tax commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Additional opportunities to enter into a delinquent tax contract shall be at the commissioner's sole discretion. A delinquent tax contract entered into under this section shall provide for the payment of any delinquent or unpaid current taxes, or both, in installments over a period, beginning on the date of the first payment made under the contract, not to exceed six years at the election of the taxpayer. Each delinquent tax contract entered into under this section shall specify the number of installments, the amount of each installment, and the schedule for payment of the installments. The part of each installment payment representing taxes, fees, charges, interest, and penalties shall be treated as a regular payment of the tax, fee, charge, penalty, or interest under applicable law. When an installment payment is not received by the commissioner when due under a delinquent tax contract entered into under this section, the delinquent tax contract becomes void unless the commissioner permits a new delinquent tax contract to be entered into. Sec. 5703.60. (A) If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed under a law that specifies that this section applies, the tax commissioner shall proceed as follows: (1) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the commissioner may correct the assessment by issuing a corrected assessment. The corrected assessment may reduce or increase the previous assessment, as the commissioner finds proper. The commissioner shall send the corrected assessment by ordinary mail to the address to which the original assessment was sent, unless the petitioner notifies the commissioner of a different address. The commissioner's mailing of the corrected assessment is an assessment timely made and issued to the extent that the original assessment was timely made and issued, notwithstanding any time limitation otherwise imposed by law. Within sixty days after the mailing of the corrected assessment, the petitioner may file a new petition for reassessment. The petition shall be filed in the same manner as provided by law for filing the original petition. If a new petition is properly filed within the sixty-day period, the commissioner shall proceed under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section. If a new petition is not properly filed within the sixty-day period, the corrected assessment becomes final, and the amount of the corrected assessment is due and payable from the person assessed. The issuance of a corrected assessment under this division nullifies the petition for reassessment filed before such issuance, and that petition shall not be subject to further administrative review or appeal. The commissioner may issue to the person assessed only one corrected assessment under this division. (2) The commissioner may cancel the assessment by issuing either a corrected assessment or a final determination. The commissioner may mail the cancellation in the same manner as a corrected assessment under division (A)(1) of this section. Cancellation of an assessment pursuant to this division is not subject to further administrative review or appeal. (3) If no corrected assessment or final determination is issued under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, or if a new petition for reassessment is properly filed under division (A)(1) of this section, the commissioner shall review the assessment or corrected assessment petition that is still pending. If the petitioner requests a hearing, the commissioner shall assign a time and place for the hearing and notify the petitioner of such time and place, but the commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time as necessary. Upon The hearing shall be held not later than one hundred eighty days after the hearing is requested, unless the petitioner files a request to extend this deadline by ninety days, which the commissioner shall grant, or the deadline is extended pursuant to division (A)(5) of this section or, for not more than one hundred eighty additional days, by agreement of the petitioner and commissioner. Subject to division (A)(4) of this section, upon completion of the review and hearing, if requested by the person assessed, the commissioner shall either cancel the assessment or corrected assessment by issuing a corrected assessment or final determination under division (A)(2) of this section, or issue a final determination that reduces, affirms, or increases the assessment or corrected assessment, as the commissioner finds proper. If a final determination is issued under this division, a copy of it shall be served on the petitioner in the manner provided by section 5703.37 of the Revised Code, and it is subject to appeal under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. Only objections decided on the merits by the board of tax appeals or a court shall be given the effect of collateral estoppel or res judicata in considering an application for refund of amounts paid pursuant to the assessment or corrected assessment. (4) During a hearing described in division (A)(3) of this section, the petitioner may request that the tax commissioner disclose to the petitioner or the petitioner's representative any proposed final determination. The commissioner shall comply with any such request and shall not issue a final determination until at least thirty days following delivery of the proposed final determination to the petitioner or representative. During that thirty-day period, the petitioner may respond to the proposed final determination or provide additional supporting documentation to the commissioner. If the petitioner does not respond to the proposed final determination during that thirty-day period, the proposed final determination shall be deemed, on the last day of such period, to be the final determination, which may be appealed under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall subsequently issue a final determination with the same content as the proposed final determination but, for the purposes of appeals under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code, the final determination shall be considered to have been issued on the last day of the thirty-day period. If the petitioner does respond to the proposed final determination during that thirty-day period, the commissioner may issue the final determination within thirty days after receiving the response or documentation. If that deadline expires without issuance of a final determination, then on that expiration date the proposed final determination is deemed to be the final determination, which may be appealed under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. Upon the written consent of the petitioner, the commissioner may extend the thirty-day period for issuing a final determination under this paragraph by up to an additional thirty days. (5) The commissioner may, within sixty days after the filing of a petition for reassessment, submit a request to the petitioner for a settlement conference to explore opportunities to resolve the petition. If the petitioner accepts the request, the conference shall be held within one hundred eighty days after the petition's filing date and the deadline by which a hearing must be held under division (A)(3) of this section shall be extended by the number of days between the date the commissioner makes the request for a conference and the date of the conference. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, in addition to the authority provided in division (A) of this section and division (H) of section 5703.05 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner, on the commissioner's own motion, may issue a corrected assessment with regard to the assessment of any tax for which a properly filed petition for reassessment would be subject to division (A) of this section. A corrected assessment may be issued under this division only if the original assessment has not been certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, or is not an appeal pursuant to section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. The corrected assessment shall not increase the amount of tax, penalty, or additional charge if the statute of limitations to issue a new assessment for such increase has expired. The corrected assessment shall be issued and reviewed in the same manner as a corrected assessment under division (A)(1) of this section. (C) If the tax commissioner issues a corrected assessment or final determination under this section that reduces an assessment below the amount paid thereon, and the reduction is made at the written request of the party assessed, either through the filing of a proper petition for reassessment or otherwise, the commissioner shall certify any overpayment as a refund due only to the extent a refund could have been timely claimed when the request was made. If the reduction is made on the commissioner's own motion, the commissioner shall certify any overpayment as a refund due only to the extent a refund could have been timely claimed at the time the reduction was made. (D) The tax commissioner shall not issue a corrected assessment under division (A)(1) or (B) of this section after the party assessed has requested in writing that the commissioner not use that procedure. (E) This section does not require the tax commissioner to issue a corrected assessment. (F) Notwithstanding any other section of the Revised Code, interest on an assessment for which a petition for reassessment has been filed shall no longer accrue more than one year after the filing date of that petition through the date that the commissioner issues a final determination on that petition. (G) Nothing in this section prohibits the tax commissioner from doing either of the following between the time a petition for reassessment is filed and a final determination is issued: (1) Requesting additional supporting documentation from the petitioner; (2) Communicating about, negotiating, or entering into a settlement agreement with a petitioner, regardless of whether a settlement conference is held under division (A)(5) of this section. Sec. 5703.70. (A) On the filing of an application for refund under section 718.91, 3734.905, 4307.05, 4307.07, 5726.30, 5727.28, 5727.91, 5728.061, 5733.12, 5735.122, 5735.13, 5735.14, 5735.141, 5735.142, 5735.18, 5736.08, 5739.07, 5739.104, 5741.10, 5743.05, 5743.53, 5747.11, 5749.08, 5751.08, or 5753.06 of the Revised Code, or an application for compensation under section 5739.061 of the Revised Code, if the tax commissioner determines that the amount of the refund or compensation to which the applicant is entitled is less than the amount claimed in the application, the commissioner shall give the applicant written notice electronically or by ordinary certified mail of the amount. If sent by ordinary certified mail, the notice shall be sent to the address shown on the application unless the applicant notifies the commissioner of a different address. If sent electronically, the notice shall be sent to the person or the person's authorized representative through secure electronic means associated with the person's or representative's last known electronic mail address, but only with the person's consent. The applicant shall have sixty days from the date the commissioner electronically sends or mails the notice to provide additional information to the commissioner or request a hearing, or both. (B) If the applicant neither requests a hearing nor provides additional information to the tax commissioner within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the commissioner shall take no further action, and the refund or compensation amount denied becomes final. (C)(1) If the applicant requests a hearing within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the tax commissioner shall assign a time and place for the hearing and notify the applicant of such time and place, but the commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time, as necessary. The hearing shall be held not later than one hundred eighty days after the hearing is requested, unless the applicant files a request to extend this deadline by ninety days, which the commissioner shall grant, or the deadline is extended as required by division (C)(5) of this section or, for not more than one hundred eighty additional days, by agreement of the applicant and commissioner. After Subject to division (C)(4) of this section, after the hearing, the commissioner may make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper, and shall issue a final determination thereon. (2) If the applicant does not request a hearing, but provides additional information, within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the commissioner shall review the information, make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper, and issue a final determination thereon. The commissioner may review such information and make such adjustments as many times as the commissioner finds proper before the issuance of a final determination. (3) If the applicant requests a hearing and provides additional information within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the commissioner may review the information and make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper. The commissioner may review such information and make such adjustments as many times as the commissioner finds proper before the issuance of a final determination. The commissioner shall assign a time and place for the hearing and notify the applicant of such time and place, but the commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time, as necessaryand the deadline for holding the hearing and the circumstances for extending that deadline shall be the same as described in division (C)(1) of this section. After Subject to division (C)(4) of this section, after the hearing, the commissioner may make any additional adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper and shall issue a final determination thereon. (4) During a hearing described in division (C)(1) or (3) of this section, the applicant may request that the tax commissioner disclose to the applicant or the applicant's representative any proposed final determination. The commissioner shall comply with any such request and shall not issue a final determination until at least thirty days following delivery of the proposed final determination to the applicant or representative. During that thirty-day period, the applicant may respond to the proposed final determination or provide additional supporting documentation to the commissioner. If the applicant does not respond to the proposed final determination during that thirty-day period, the proposed final determination shall be deemed, on the last day of such period, to be the final determination, which may be appealed under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall subsequently issue a final determination with the same content as the proposed final determination but, for the purposes of appeals under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code, the final determination shall be considered to have been issued on the last day of the thirty-day period. If the applicant does not respond to the proposed final determination during that thirty-day period, the commissioner may issue a final determination within thirty days after receiving the response or documentation. If that deadline expires without issuance of a final determination, then on that expiration date the proposed final determination is deemed to be the final determination, which may be appealed under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. Upon the written consent of the applicant, the commissioner may extend the thirty-day period for issuing a final determination under this paragraph by up to an additional thirty days. (5) The commissioner may, within sixty days after the applicant requests a hearing, submit a request to the applicant for a settlement conference to explore opportunities to agree upon the amount of the refund. If the applicant accepts the request, the conference shall be held not later than one hundred eighty days after the hearing request has been filed and the date on which the hearing would otherwise be held shall be extended by the number of days between the date the commissioner makes the request for a conference and the date of the conference. After the conference, if the applicant and the commissioner arrive at an agreement, the commissioner shall make any agreed-upon adjustments to the refund or compensation and shall issue a final determination thereon. (6) The commissioner shall serve a copy of the final determination made under division (C)(1), (2), or (3), or (5) of this section on the applicant in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code, and the decision is final, subject to appeal under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. (D) The tax commissioner shall certify to the director of budget and management and treasurer of state for payment from the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code, the amount of the refund to be refunded under division (B) or (C) of this section. The commissioner also shall certify to the director and treasurer of state for payment from the general revenue fund the amount of compensation to be paid under division (B) or (C) of this section. (E) Nothing in this section prohibits the tax commissioner doing either of the following between the time a hearing is requested or the applicant provides additional information to the commissioner and a final determination is issued: (1) Requesting additional supporting documentation from the applicant; (2) Communicating about, negotiating, or entering into a settlement agreement with an applicant, regardless of whether a settlement conference is held under division (C)(5) of this section. Sec. 5717.01. An appeal from a decision of a county board of revision may be taken to the board of tax appeals within thirty days after notice of the decision of the county board of revision is mailed as provided in division (A) of section 5715.20 of the Revised Code. Such an appeal may be taken by the county auditor, the tax commissioner, or any board, legislative authority, public official, or taxpayer authorized by section 5715.19 of the Revised Code to file complaints against valuations or assessments with the auditor, except that a subdivision or the legislative authority or mayor of a subdivision may file such an appeal only if the subdivision owns or leases the property that is the subject of the board of revision's decision, and except that no such appeal may be taken by a third party complainant, as defined in that section. Such appeal shall be taken by the filing of a notice of appeal, in person or by certified mail, express mail, facsimile transmission, electronic transmission, or by authorized delivery service, with the board of tax appeals and with the county board of revision. If notice of appeal is filed by certified mail, express mail, or authorized delivery service as provided in section 5703.056 of the Revised Code, the date of the United States postmark placed on the sender's receipt by the postal service or the date of receipt recorded by the authorized delivery service shall be treated as the date of filing. If notice of appeal is filed by facsimile transmission or electronic transmission, the date and time the notice is received by the board shall be the date and time reflected on a timestamp provided by the board's electronic system, and the appeal shall be considered filed with the board on the date reflected on that timestamp. Any timestamp provided by another computer system or electronic submission device shall not affect the time and date the notice is received by the board. Upon receipt of such notice of appeal such county board of revision shall notify all persons thereof who were parties to the proceeding before such county board of revision by either certified mail or, if the board has record of an internet identifier of record associated with such a person, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record, and shall file proof of such notice or, in the case of ordinary mail, an affidavit attesting that the board sent the notice with the board of tax appeals. The county board of revision shall thereupon certify to the board of tax appeals a transcript of the record of the proceedings of the county board of revision pertaining to the original complaint, and all evidence offered in connection therewith. Such appeal may be heard by the board of tax appeals at its offices in Columbus or in the county where the property is listed for taxation, or the board of tax appeals may cause its examiners to conduct such hearing and to report to it their findings for affirmation or rejection. An appeal may proceed pursuant to section 5703.021 of the Revised Code on the small claims docket if the appeal qualifies under that section. The board of tax appeals may order the appeal to be heard on the record and the evidence certified to it by the county board of revision, or it may order the hearing of additional evidence, and it may make such investigation concerning the appeal as it deems proper. If the board orders a hearing, the board shall render its decision within twelve months after the date of that hearing. If the board does not order a hearing, the board shall render its decision within twelve months after the last date on which a brief was filed in the case. In either case, the time for rendering the decision may be extended with the consent of all parties to the appeal. As used in this section, "internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5717.011. (A) As used in this chapter, "tax administrator" has the same meaning as in section 718.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Appeals from a final determination of a local board of tax review created under section 718.11 of the Revised Code may be taken by the taxpayer or the tax administrator to the board of tax appeals or may be taken by the taxpayer or the tax administrator to a court of common pleas as otherwise provided by law. If the taxpayer or the tax administrator elects to make an appeal to the board of tax appeals or court of common pleas, and subject to section 5703.021 of the Revised Code with respect to appeals assigned to the small claims docket, the appeal shall be taken by the filing of a notice of appeal with the board of tax appeals or court of common pleas, the local board of tax review, and the opposing party. The notice of appeal shall be filed within sixty days after the day the appellant receives notice of the final determination issued under section 718.11 of the Revised Code. An appeal filed with a court of common pleas is governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure and other rules of practice and procedure applicable to civil actions. For an appeal filed with the board of tax appeals, the notice of appeal may be filed in person or by certified mail, express mail, facsimile transmission, electronic transmission, or by authorized delivery service as provided in section 5703.056 of the Revised Code. If the notice of appeal is filed by certified mail, express mail, or authorized delivery service as provided in section 5703.056 of the Revised Code, the date of the United States postmark placed on the sender's receipt by the postal service or the date of receipt recorded by the authorized delivery service shall be treated as the date of filing with the board. If notice of appeal is filed by facsimile transmission or electronic transmission, the date and time the notice is received by the board shall be the date and time reflected on a timestamp provided by the board's electronic system, and the appeal shall be considered filed with the board on the date reflected on that timestamp. Any timestamp provided by another computer system or electronic submission device shall not affect the time and date the notice is received by the board. The notice of appeal shall have attached thereto and incorporated therein by reference a true copy of the final determination issued under section 718.11 of the Revised Code, but failure to attach a copy of such notice and incorporate it by reference in the notice of appeal does not invalidate the appeal. (C) A notice of appeal for an appeal filed with the board of tax appeals shall contain a short and plain statement of the claimed errors in the final determination of the local board of tax review showing that the appellant is entitled to relief and a demand for the relief to which the appellant claims to be entitled. An appellant may amend the notice of appeal once as a matter of course within sixty days after the certification of the transcript. Otherwise, an appellant may amend the notice of appeal only after receiving leave of the board or the written consent of each adverse party. Leave of the board shall be freely given when justice so requires. (D) Upon the filing of a notice of appeal with the board of tax appeals, the local board of tax review shall certify to the board of tax appeals a transcript of the record of the proceedings before it, together with all evidence considered by it in connection therewith. Such appeals may be heard by the board at its office in Columbus or in the county where the appellant resides, or it may cause its examiners to conduct such hearings and to report to it their findings for affirmation or rejection. The board may order the appeal to be heard upon the record and the evidence certified to it by the tax administrator, but upon the application of any interested party the board shall order the hearing of additional evidence, and the board may make such investigation concerning the appeal as it considers proper. An appeal may proceed pursuant to section 5703.021 of the Revised Code on the small claims docket if the appeals qualifies under that section. If the board orders a hearing, the board shall render its decision within twelve months after the date of that hearing. If the board does not order a hearing, the board shall render its decision within twelve months after the last date on which a brief was filed in the case. In either case, the time for rendering the decision may be extended with the consent of all parties to the appeal. (E) If an issue being appealed under this section is addressed in a municipal corporation's ordinance or regulation, the tax administrator, upon the request of the board of tax appeals, shall provide a copy of the ordinance or regulation to the board of tax appeals. Sec. 5717.02. (A) Except as otherwise provided by law, appeals from final determinations by the tax commissioner of any preliminary, amended, or final tax assessments, reassessments, valuations, determinations, findings, computations, or orders made by the commissioner may be taken to the board of tax appeals by the taxpayer, by the person to whom notice of the tax assessment, reassessment, valuation, determination, finding, computation, or order by the commissioner is required by law to be given, by the director of budget and management if the revenues affected by that decision would accrue primarily to the state treasury, or by the county auditors of the counties to the undivided general tax funds of which the revenues affected by that decision would primarily accrue. Appeals from the redetermination by the director of development services under division (B) of section 5709.64 or division (A) of section 5709.66 of the Revised Code may be taken to the board of tax appeals by the enterprise to which notice of the redetermination is required by law to be given. Appeals from a decision of the tax commissioner or county auditor concerning an application for a property tax exemption may be taken to the board of tax appeals by the applicant or by a school district that filed a statement concerning that application under division (C) of section 5715.27 of the Revised Code. Appeals from a redetermination by the director of job and family services under section 5733.42 of the Revised Code may be taken by the person to which the notice of the redetermination is required by law to be given under that section. (B) The appeals shall be taken by the filing of a notice of appeal with the board, and with the tax commissioner if the tax commissioner's action is the subject of the appeal, with the county auditor if the county auditor's action is the subject of the appeal, with the director of development services if that director's action is the subject of the appeal, or with the director of job and family services if that director's action is the subject of the appeal. The notice of appeal shall be filed within sixty days after service of the notice of the tax assessment, reassessment, valuation, determination, finding, computation, or order by the commissioner, property tax exemption determination by the commissioner or the county auditor, or redetermination by the director has been given as provided in section 5703.37, 5709.64, 5709.66, or 5733.42 of the Revised Code. The notice of appeal may be filed in person or by certified mail, express mail, facsimile transmission, electronic transmission or by authorized delivery service. If the notice of appeal is filed by certified mail, express mail, or authorized delivery service as provided in section 5703.056 of the Revised Code, the date of the United States postmark placed on the sender's receipt by the postal service or the date of receipt recorded by the authorized delivery service shall be treated as the date of filing. If notice of appeal is filed by facsimile transmission or electronic transmission, the date and time the notice is received by the board shall be the date and time reflected on a timestamp provided by the board's electronic system, and the appeal shall be considered filed with the board on the date reflected on that timestamp. Any timestamp provided by another computer system or electronic submission device shall not affect the time and date the notice is received by the board. The notice of appeal shall have attached to it and incorporated in it by reference a true copy of the notice sent by the commissioner, county auditor, or director to the taxpayer, enterprise, or other person of the final determination or redetermination complained of, but failure to attach a copy of that notice and to incorporate it by reference in the notice of appeal does not invalidate the appeal. (C) A notice of appeal shall contain a short and plain statement of the claimed errors in the determination or redetermination of the tax commissioner, county auditor, or director showing that the appellant is entitled to relief and a demand for the relief to which the appellant claims to be entitled. An appellant may amend the notice of appeal once as a matter of course within sixty days after the certification of the transcript. Otherwise, an appellant may amend the notice of appeal only after receiving leave of the board or the written consent of each adverse party. Leave of the board shall be freely given when justice so requires. (D) Upon the filing of a notice of appeal, the tax commissioner, county auditor, or the director, as appropriate, shall certify to the board a transcript of the record of the proceedings before the commissioner, auditor, or director, together with all evidence considered by the commissioner, auditor, or director in connection with the proceedings. Those appeals or applications may be heard by the board at its office in Columbus or in the county where the appellant resides, or it may cause its examiners to conduct the hearings and to report to it their findings for affirmation or rejection. (E) The board may order the appeal to be heard upon the record and the evidence certified to it by the commissioner, county auditor, or director, but upon the application of any interested party the board shall order the hearing of additional evidence, and it may make an investigation concerning the appeal that it considers proper. An appeal may proceed pursuant to section 5703.021 of the Revised Code on the small claims docket if the appeal qualifies under that section. If the board orders a hearing, the board shall render its decision within twelve months after the date of that hearing. If the board does not order a hearing, the board shall render its decision within twelve months after the last date on which a brief was filed in the case. In either case, the time for rendering the decision may be extended with the consent of all parties to the appeal. Sec. 5717.021. If the tax commissioner has not issued a final determination or proposed a final determination within one year after a hearing held under section 5703.60 or 5703.70 of the Revised Code occurs or, if a petitioner does not request a hearing under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code, within one year after the petition for reassessment is filed, then the petitioner or applicant, respectively, may appeal the assessment or denial of a refund, respectively, to the board of tax appeals. The appeal shall be taken in the same manner as an appeal taken under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code, except as follows: (A) The assessment or denial of the refund shall be the tax commissioner's determination that is appealed against. (B) The transcript of the record of proceedings that the commissioner is required to file shall include any information, records, or documents that relate to the petition or denial. (C) Any objection raised by the appellant in its petition for reassessment, any objection raised by the appellant in writing to the commissioner after the filing of a petition for reassessment but before the filing of an appeal under this section, or any documentation submitted to the commissioner in response to the commissioner's denial of a refund shall be considered denied by the commissioner and an error that may be appealed. (D) In the case of an appeal of a refund denial, an appellant may raise any basis as to why the denial was improper, even if the basis was not raised before the filing of the appeal under this section. (E) Within sixty days after the notice of appeal is filed, the commissioner shall file a short and plain statement of the bases for sustaining an assessment or the denial of a refund, all of which must have been communicated in writing to the appellant before the filing of the appeal under this section. The board may deny an appeal filed under this section only on the basis of an issue raised in the commissioner's statement. (F) Within thirty days after the commissioner's statement is filed under division (E) of this section, the appellant may amend the notice of appeal in order to raise additional objections to the commissioner's position. (G) If, for an appeal filed under this section, an appellant makes a prima facie showing of the facts necessary to support the appellant's position, the tax commissioner has the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that the assessment should be sustained or the refund should be denied. Sec. 5721.011. Immediately No sooner than six months after each settlement required by division (C) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, each county auditor shall compile, in substantially the same form as the list and duplicate prepared pursuant to section 319.28 of the Revised Code, a list and duplicate of all delinquent lands in the auditor's county. In any such list there may be included lands that have been omitted from a prior list. Lands on which the only unpaid taxes are amounts claimed in good faith not to be due in complaints pending under section 5715.19 of the Revised Code and lands that are the subject of an application for exemption from taxation under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code shall not be included in the list. The delinquent land list and duplicate shall contain the description of the property and the name of the person in whose name it is listed as they appear on the tax list of the previous tax year and the total amount of all taxes, assessments, recoupment charges, penalties, and interest that were due and unpaid against the entry at the settlement and that remain unpaid. The list shall set forth as separate items any interest required to be so entered under divisions (B)(1), (2), and (3) of section 323.121 of the Revised Code. The original list shall be kept in the office of the auditor, and the duplicate shall be certified and delivered to the county treasurer within thirty days after the settlement required by division (C) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5726.21. (A) In addition to any other penalty imposed by this chapter or Chapter 5703. of the Revised Code, and except as provided in division (D) of this section, the following penalties shall apply: (1) If a taxpayer required to file any report under this chapter fails to make and file the report within the time prescribed, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of fifty dollars per month or fraction of a month, not to exceed five hundred dollars, or five per cent per month or fraction of a month, not to exceed fifty per cent of the tax required to be shown on the report, for each month or fraction of a month elapsing between the due date and the date on which the report is filed. (2) If a taxpayer fails to pay the amount of tax required to be paid under this chapter, except for estimated tax under section 5726.06 of the Revised Code, by the dates prescribed in this chapter for payment, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding fifteen per cent of the delinquent payment. (3) If a taxpayer files what purports to be a report required by this chapter that does not contain information upon which the substantial correctness of the report may be judged or contains information that on its face indicates that the report is substantially incorrect, and the filing of the report in that manner is due to a position that is frivolous or a desire that is apparent from the report to delay or impede the administration of the tax levied under this chapter, a penalty of up to five hundred dollars may be imposed. (4) If a taxpayer makes a fraudulent attempt to evade the reporting or payment of the tax required to be shown on any report required under this chapter, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of one thousand dollars or one hundred per cent of the tax required to be shown on the report. (5) If a taxpayer makes a false or fraudulent claim for a refund under this chapter, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of one thousand dollars or one hundred per cent of the claim. (B) The tax commissioner may collect any penalty imposed by this section in the same manner as the tax levied under this chapter. Penalties so collected shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax levied under this chapter. (C) For purposes of this section, the tax required to be shown on the report shall be reduced by the amount of any part of the tax paid on or before the date prescribed for filing the report. (D) No penalty shall be imposed under division (A) of this section for failure to file a report required by section 5726.06 of the Revised Code if the taxpayer has not failed to file a report under that section in any preceding tax year. (E) The tax commissioner may abate all or a portion of any penalties imposed under this section and may adopt rules governing such abatements. Sec. 5739.02. For the purpose of providing revenue with which to meet the needs of the state, for the use of the general revenue fund of the state, for the purpose of securing a thorough and efficient system of common schools throughout the state, for the purpose of affording revenues, in addition to those from general property taxes, permitted under constitutional limitations, and from other sources, for the support of local governmental functions, and for the purpose of reimbursing the state for the expense of administering this chapter, an excise tax is hereby levied on each retail sale made in this state. (A)(1) The tax shall be collected as provided in section 5739.025 of the Revised Code. The rate of the tax shall be five and three-fourths per cent. The tax applies and is collectible when the sale is made, regardless of the time when the price is paid or delivered. (2) In the case of the lease or rental, with a fixed term of more than thirty days or an indefinite term with a minimum period of more than thirty days, of any motor vehicles designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of not more than one ton, watercraft, outboard motor, or aircraft, or of any tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of more than one ton, to be used by the lessee or renter primarily for business purposes, the tax shall be collected by the vendor at the time the lease or rental is consummated and shall be calculated by the vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid by the lessee or renter under the lease agreement. If the total amount of the consideration for the lease or rental includes amounts that are not calculated at the time the lease or rental is executed, the tax shall be calculated and collected by the vendor at the time such amounts are billed to the lessee or renter. In the case of an open-end lease or rental, the tax shall be calculated by the vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid during the initial fixed term of the lease or rental, and for each subsequent renewal period as it comes due. As used in this division, "motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, and "watercraft" includes an outdrive unit attached to the watercraft. A lease with a renewal clause and a termination penalty or similar provision that applies if the renewal clause is not exercised is presumed to be a sham transaction. In such a case, the tax shall be calculated and paid on the basis of the entire length of the lease period, including any renewal periods, until the termination penalty or similar provision no longer applies. The taxpayer shall bear the burden, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the transaction or series of transactions is not a sham transaction. (3) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, in the case of a sale, the price of which consists in whole or in part of the lease or rental of tangible personal property, the tax shall be measured by the installments of that lease or rental. (4) In the case of a sale of a physical fitness facility service or recreation and sports club service, the price of which consists in whole or in part of a membership for the receipt of the benefit of the service, the tax applicable to the sale shall be measured by the installments thereof. (B) The tax does not apply to the following: (1) Sales to the state or any of its political subdivisions, or to any other state or its political subdivisions if the laws of that state exempt from taxation sales made to this state and its political subdivisions including either of the following: (a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or temporary structures, including material and equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political subdivisions take title to, or permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal property for use by the state or any of its political subdivisions, including for use by the general public thereof; (b) Sales of services by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political subdivisions, including the general public thereof, receive the benefit of such services. As used in divisions (B)(1)(a) and (b) of this section, "temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, and pavement. (2) Sales of food for human consumption off the premises where sold; (3) Sales of food sold to students only in a cafeteria, dormitory, fraternity, or sorority maintained in a private, public, or parochial school, college, or university; (4) Sales of newspapers and sales or transfers of magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; (5) The furnishing, preparing, or serving of meals without charge by an employer to an employee provided the employer records the meals as part compensation for services performed or work done; (6)(a) Sales of motor fuel upon receipt, use, distribution, or sale of which in this state a tax is imposed by the law of this state, but this exemption shall not apply to the sale of motor fuel on which a refund of the tax is allowable under division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code; and the tax commissioner may deduct the amount of tax levied by this section applicable to the price of motor fuel when granting a refund of motor fuel tax pursuant to division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code and shall cause the amount deducted to be paid into the general revenue fund of this state; (b) Sales of motor fuel other than that described in division (B)(6)(a) of this section and used for powering a refrigeration unit on a vehicle other than one used primarily to provide comfort to the operator or occupants of the vehicle. (7) Sales of natural gas by a natural gas company or municipal gas utility, of water by a water-works company, or of steam by a heating company, if in each case the thing sold is delivered to consumers through pipes or conduits, and all sales of communications services by a telegraph company, all terms as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code, and sales of electricity delivered through wires; (8) Casual sales by a person, or auctioneer employed directly by the person to conduct such sales, except as to such sales of motor vehicles, watercraft or outboard motors required to be titled under section 1548.06 of the Revised Code, watercraft documented with the United States coast guard, snowmobiles, and all-purpose vehicles as defined in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code; (9)(a) Sales of services or tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles, mobile homes, and manufactured homes, by churches, organizations exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes as defined in division (B)(12) of this section, provided that the number of days on which such tangible personal property or services, other than items never subject to the tax, are sold does not exceed six in any calendar year, except as otherwise provided in division (B)(9)(b) of this section. If the number of days on which such sales are made exceeds six in any calendar year, the church or organization shall be considered to be engaged in business and all subsequent sales by it shall be subject to the tax. In counting the number of days, all sales by groups within a church or within an organization shall be considered to be sales of that church or organization. (b) The limitation on the number of days on which tax-exempt sales may be made by a church or organization under division (B)(9)(a) of this section does not apply to sales made by student clubs and other groups of students of a primary or secondary school, or a parent-teacher association, booster group, or similar organization that raises money to support or fund curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school. (c) Divisions (B)(9)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to sales by a noncommercial educational radio or television broadcasting station. (10) Sales not within the taxing power of this state under the Constitution or laws of the United States or the Constitution of this state including either of the following: (a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or temporary structures, including material and equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States takes title to, or permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal property for use by the United States including for use by the general public thereof; (b) Sales of services by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States, including the general public thereof, receives the benefit of such services. As used in divisions (B)(10)(a) and (b) of this section, "temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, and pavement. (11) Except for transactions that are sales under division (B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, the transportation of persons or property, unless the transportation is by a private investigation and security service; (12) Sales of tangible personal property or services to churches, to organizations exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and to any other nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes in this state, no part of the net income of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and no substantial part of the activities of which consists of carrying on propaganda or otherwise attempting to influence legislation; sales to offices administering one or more homes for the aged or one or more hospital facilities exempt under section 140.08 of the Revised Code; and sales to organizations described in division (D) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. "Charitable purposes" means the relief of poverty; the improvement of health through the alleviation of illness, disease, or injury; the operation of an organization exclusively for the provision of professional, laundry, printing, and purchasing services to hospitals or charitable institutions; the operation of a home for the aged, as defined in section 5701.13 of the Revised Code; the operation of a radio or television broadcasting station that is licensed by the federal communications commission as a noncommercial educational radio or television station; the operation of a nonprofit animal adoption service or a county humane society; the promotion of education by an institution of learning that maintains a faculty of qualified instructors, teaches regular continuous courses of study, and confers a recognized diploma upon completion of a specific curriculum; the operation of a parent-teacher association, booster group, or similar organization primarily engaged in the promotion and support of the curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school; the operation of a community or area center in which presentations in music, dramatics, the arts, and related fields are made in order to foster public interest and education therein; the production of performances in music, dramatics, and the arts; or the promotion of education by an organization engaged in carrying on research in, or the dissemination of, scientific and technological knowledge and information primarily for the public. Nothing in this division shall be deemed to exempt sales to any organization for use in the operation or carrying on of a trade or business, or sales to a home for the aged for use in the operation of independent living facilities as defined in division (A) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. (13) Building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property under a construction contract with this state or a political subdivision of this state, or with the United States government or any of its agencies; building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property that are accepted for ownership by this state or any of its political subdivisions, or by the United States government or any of its agencies at the time of completion of the structures or improvements; building and construction materials sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a horticulture structure or livestock structure for a person engaged in the business of horticulture or producing livestock; building materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into a house of public worship or religious education, or a building used exclusively for charitable purposes under a construction contract with an organization whose purpose is as described in division (B)(12) of this section; building materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into a building under a construction contract with an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 when the building is to be used exclusively for the organization's exempt purposes; tangible personal property sold for incorporation into the construction of a sports facility under section 307.696 of the Revised Code; building and construction materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into real property outside this state if such materials and services, when sold to a construction contractor in the state in which the real property is located for incorporation into real property in that state, would be exempt from a tax on sales levied by that state; building and construction materials for incorporation into a transportation facility pursuant to a public-private agreement entered into under sections 5501.70 to 5501.83 of the Revised Code; until one calendar year after the construction of a convention center that qualifies for property tax exemption under section 5709.084 of the Revised Code is completed, building and construction materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into the real property comprising that convention center; and building and construction materials sold for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property that is used primarily as, or primarily in support of, a manufacturing facility or research and development facility and that is to be owned by a megaproject operator upon completion and located at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated. This division does not apply to building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property under a construction contract with a port authority if the contract is subject to section 4582.72 of the Revised Code but approval from the appropriate board of county commissioners, as required by that section, has not been obtained. (14) Sales of ships or vessels or rail rolling stock used or to be used principally in interstate or foreign commerce, and repairs, alterations, fuel, and lubricants for such ships or vessels or rail rolling stock; (15) Sales to persons primarily engaged in any of the activities mentioned in division (B)(42)(a), (g), or (h) of this section, to persons engaged in making retail sales, or to persons who purchase for sale from a manufacturer tangible personal property that was produced by the manufacturer in accordance with specific designs provided by the purchaser, of packages, including material, labels, and parts for packages, and of machinery, equipment, and material for use primarily in packaging tangible personal property produced for sale, including any machinery, equipment, and supplies used to make labels or packages, to prepare packages or products for labeling, or to label packages or products, by or on the order of the person doing the packaging, or sold at retail. "Packages" includes bags, baskets, cartons, crates, boxes, cans, bottles, bindings, wrappings, and other similar devices and containers, but does not include motor vehicles or bulk tanks, trailers, or similar devices attached to motor vehicles. "Packaging" means placing in a package. Division (B)(15) of this section does not apply to persons engaged in highway transportation for hire. (16) Sales of food to persons using supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits to purchase the food. As used in this division, "food" has the same meaning as in 7 U.S.C. 2012 and federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008. (17) Sales to persons engaged in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture, of tangible personal property for use or consumption primarily in the production by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture of other tangible personal property for use or consumption primarily in the production of tangible personal property for sale by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture; or material and parts for incorporation into any such tangible personal property for use or consumption in production; and of tangible personal property for such use or consumption in the conditioning or holding of products produced by and for such use, consumption, or sale by persons engaged in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture, except where such property is incorporated into real property; (18) Sales of drugs for a human being that may be dispensed only pursuant to a prescription; insulin as recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia; urine and blood testing materials when used by diabetics or persons with hypoglycemia to test for glucose or acetone; hypodermic syringes and needles when used by diabetics for insulin injections; epoetin alfa when purchased for use in the treatment of persons with medical disease; hospital beds when purchased by hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; and medical oxygen and medical oxygen-dispensing equipment when purchased by hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; (19) Sales of prosthetic devices, durable medical equipment for home use, or mobility enhancing equipment, when made pursuant to a prescription and when such devices or equipment are for use by a human being. (20) Sales of emergency and fire protection vehicles and equipment to nonprofit organizations for use solely in providing fire protection and emergency services, including trauma care and emergency medical services, for political subdivisions of the state; (21) Sales of tangible personal property manufactured in this state, if sold by the manufacturer in this state to a retailer for use in the retail business of the retailer outside of this state and if possession is taken from the manufacturer by the purchaser within this state for the sole purpose of immediately removing the same from this state in a vehicle owned by the purchaser; (22) Sales of services provided by the state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities, or by governmental entities of the state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities; (23) Sales of motor vehicles to nonresidents of this state under the circumstances described in division (B) of section 5739.029 of the Revised Code; (24) Sales to persons engaged in the preparation of eggs for sale of tangible personal property used or consumed directly in such preparation, including such tangible personal property used for cleaning, sanitizing, preserving, grading, sorting, and classifying by size; packages, including material and parts for packages, and machinery, equipment, and material for use in packaging eggs for sale; and handling and transportation equipment and parts therefor, except motor vehicles licensed to operate on public highways, used in intraplant or interplant transfers or shipment of eggs in the process of preparation for sale, when the plant or plants within or between which such transfers or shipments occur are operated by the same person. "Packages" includes containers, cases, baskets, flats, fillers, filler flats, cartons, closure materials, labels, and labeling materials, and "packaging" means placing therein. (25)(a) Sales of water to a consumer for residential use; (b) Sales of water by a nonprofit corporation engaged exclusively in the treatment, distribution, and sale of water to consumers, if such water is delivered to consumers through pipes or tubing. (26) Fees charged for inspection or reinspection of motor vehicles under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code; (27) Sales to persons licensed to conduct a food service operation pursuant to section 3717.43 of the Revised Code, of tangible personal property primarily used directly for the following: (a) To prepare food for human consumption for sale; (b) To preserve food that has been or will be prepared for human consumption for sale by the food service operator, not including tangible personal property used to display food for selection by the consumer; (c) To clean tangible personal property used to prepare or serve food for human consumption for sale. (28) Sales of animals by nonprofit animal adoption services or county humane societies; (29) Sales of services to a corporation described in division (A) of section 5709.72 of the Revised Code, and sales of tangible personal property that qualifies for exemption from taxation under section 5709.72 of the Revised Code; (30) Sales and installation of agricultural land tile, as defined in division (B)(5)(a) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (31) Sales and erection or installation of portable grain bins, as defined in division (B)(5)(b) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (32) The sale, lease, repair, and maintenance of, parts for, or items attached to or incorporated in, motor vehicles that are primarily used for transporting tangible personal property belonging to others by a person engaged in highway transportation for hire, except for packages and packaging used for the transportation of tangible personal property; (33) Sales to the state headquarters of any veterans' organization in this state that is either incorporated and issued a charter by the congress of the United States or is recognized by the United States veterans administration, for use by the headquarters; (34) Sales to a telecommunications service vendor, mobile telecommunications service vendor, or satellite broadcasting service vendor of tangible personal property and services used directly and primarily in transmitting, receiving, switching, or recording any interactive, one- or two-way electromagnetic communications, including voice, image, data, and information, through the use of any medium, including, but not limited to, poles, wires, cables, switching equipment, computers, and record storage devices and media, and component parts for the tangible personal property. The exemption provided in this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions under division (B)(42)(a) or (n) of this section to which the vendor may otherwise be entitled, based upon the use of the thing purchased in providing the telecommunications, mobile telecommunications, or satellite broadcasting service. (35) Sales of strollers meant for transporting children from infancy to about thirty-six months of age that meet the United States consumer product safety commission safety standard for carriages and strollers under 16 C.F.R. 1227.2. (36) Sales to a person engaged in the business of horticulture or producing livestock of materials to be incorporated into a horticulture structure or livestock structure; (37) Sales of personal computers, computer monitors, computer keyboards, modems, and other peripheral computer equipment to an individual who is licensed or certified to teach in an elementary or a secondary school in this state for use by that individual in preparation for teaching elementary or secondary school students; (38) Sales of tangible personal property that is not required to be registered or licensed under the laws of this state to a citizen of a foreign nation that is not a citizen of the United States, provided the property is delivered to a person in this state that is not a related member of the purchaser, is physically present in this state for the sole purpose of temporary storage and package consolidation, and is subsequently delivered to the purchaser at a delivery address in a foreign nation. As used in division (B)(38) of this section, "related member" has the same meaning as in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code, and "temporary storage" means the storage of tangible personal property for a period of not more than sixty days. (39) Sales of used manufactured homes and used mobile homes, as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code, made on or after January 1, 2000; (40) Sales of tangible personal property and services to a provider of electricity used or consumed directly and primarily in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity for use by others, including property that is or is to be incorporated into and will become a part of the consumer's production, transmission, or distribution system and that retains its classification as tangible personal property after incorporation; fuel or power used in the production, transmission, or distribution of electricity; energy conversion equipment as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; and tangible personal property and services used in the repair and maintenance of the production, transmission, or distribution system, including only those motor vehicles as are specially designed and equipped for such use. The exemption provided in this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions in division (B)(42)(a) or (n) of this section to which a provider of electricity may otherwise be entitled based on the use of the tangible personal property or service purchased in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity. (41) Sales to a person providing services under division (B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code of tangible personal property and services used directly and primarily in providing taxable services under that section. (42) Sales where the purpose of the purchaser is to do any of the following: (a) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or a part into tangible personal property to be produced for sale by manufacturing, assembling, processing, or refining; or to use or consume the thing transferred directly in producing tangible personal property for sale by mining, including, without limitation, the extraction from the earth of all substances that are classed geologically as minerals, or directly in the rendition of a public utility service, except that the sales tax levied by this section shall be collected upon all meals, drinks, and food for human consumption sold when transporting persons. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property. (b) To hold the thing transferred as security for the performance of an obligation of the vendor; (c) To resell, hold, use, or consume the thing transferred as evidence of a contract of insurance; (d) To use or consume the thing directly in commercial fishing; (e) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or a part into, or to use or consume the thing transferred directly in the production of, magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; (f) To use or consume the thing transferred in the production and preparation in suitable condition for market and sale of printed, imprinted, overprinted, lithographic, multilithic, blueprinted, photostatic, or other productions or reproductions of written or graphic matter; (g) To use the thing transferred, as described in section 5739.011 of the Revised Code, primarily in a manufacturing operation to produce tangible personal property for sale; (h) To use the benefit of a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement, as described in division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, to repair or maintain tangible personal property, if all of the property that is the subject of the warranty, contract, or agreement would not be subject to the tax imposed by this section; (i) To use the thing transferred as qualified research and development equipment; (j) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in storing, transporting, mailing, or otherwise handling purchased sales inventory in a warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility when the inventory is primarily distributed outside this state to retail stores of the person who owns or controls the warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility, to retail stores of an affiliated group of which that person is a member, or by means of direct marketing. This division does not apply to motor vehicles registered for operation on the public highways. As used in this division, "affiliated group" has the same meaning as in division (B)(3)(e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code and "direct marketing" means the method of selling where consumers order tangible personal property by United States mail, delivery service, or telecommunication and the vendor delivers or ships the tangible personal property sold to the consumer from a warehouse, catalogue distribution center, or similar fulfillment facility by means of the United States mail, delivery service, or common carrier. (k) To use or consume the thing transferred to fulfill a contractual obligation incurred by a warrantor pursuant to a warranty provided as a part of the price of the tangible personal property sold or by a vendor of a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement the provision of which is defined as a sale under division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (l) To use or consume the thing transferred in the production of a newspaper for distribution to the public; (m) To use tangible personal property to perform a service listed in division (B)(3) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, if the property is or is to be permanently transferred to the consumer of the service as an integral part of the performance of the service; (n) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in producing tangible personal property for sale by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. Persons engaged in rendering farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture services for others are deemed engaged primarily in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property. (q)(o) To use or consume the thing transferred directly in production of crude oil and natural gas for sale. Persons engaged in rendering production services for others are deemed engaged in production. As used in division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section, "production" means operations and tangible personal property directly used to expose and evaluate an underground reservoir that may contain hydrocarbon resources, prepare the wellbore for production, and lift and control all substances yielded by the reservoir to the surface of the earth. (i) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section, the "thing transferred" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (I) Services provided in the construction of permanent access roads, services provided in the construction of the well site, and services provided in the construction of temporary impoundments; (II) Equipment and rigging used for the specific purpose of creating with integrity a wellbore pathway to underground reservoirs; (III) Drilling and workover services used to work within a subsurface wellbore, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (IV) Casing, tubulars, and float and centralizing equipment; (V) Trailers to which production equipment is attached; (VI) Well completion services, including cementing of casing, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (VII) Wireline evaluation, mud logging, and perforation services, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (VIII) Reservoir stimulation, hydraulic fracturing, and acidizing services, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services, including all material pumped downhole; (IX) Pressure pumping equipment; (X) Artificial lift systems equipment; (XI) Wellhead equipment and well site equipment used to separate, stabilize, and control hydrocarbon phases and produced water; (XII) Tangible personal property directly used to control production equipment. (ii) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section, the "thing transferred" does not include any of the following: (I) Tangible personal property used primarily in the exploration and production of any mineral resource regulated under Chapter 1509. of the Revised Code other than oil or gas; (II) Tangible personal property used primarily in storing, holding, or delivering solutions or chemicals used in well stimulation as defined in section 1509.01 of the Revised Code; (III) Tangible personal property used primarily in preparing, installing, or reclaiming foundations for drilling or pumping equipment or well stimulation material tanks; (IV) Tangible personal property used primarily in transporting, delivering, or removing equipment to or from the well site or storing such equipment before its use at the well site; (V) Tangible personal property used primarily in gathering operations occurring off the well site, including gathering pipelines transporting hydrocarbon gas or liquids away from a crude oil or natural gas production facility; (VI) Tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property; (VII) Well site fencing, lighting, or security systems; (VIII) Communication devices or services; (IX) Office supplies; (X) Trailers used as offices or lodging; (XI) Motor vehicles of any kind; (XII) Tangible personal property used primarily for the storage of drilling byproducts and fuel not used for production; (XIII) Tangible personal property used primarily as a safety device; (XIV) Data collection or monitoring devices; (XV) Access ladders, stairs, or platforms attached to storage tanks. The enumeration of tangible personal property in division (B)(42)(q)(ii)(B)(42)(o)(ii) of this section is not intended to be exhaustive, and any tangible personal property not so enumerated shall not necessarily be construed to be a "thing transferred" for the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section. The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules under sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code that the commissioner deems necessary to administer division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(o) of this section. As used in division (B)(42) of this section, "thing" includes all transactions included in divisions (B)(3)(a), (b), and (e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. (43) Sales conducted through a coin operated an automated device that activates vacuum equipment or equipment that dispenses water, whether or not in combination with soap or other cleaning agents or wax, to the consumer for the consumer's use on the premises in washing, cleaning, or waxing a motor vehicle, provided no other personal property or personal service is provided as part of the transactionautomated service. (44) Sales of replacement and modification parts for engines, airframes, instruments, and interiors in, and paint for, aircraft used primarily in a fractional aircraft ownership program, and sales of services for the repair, modification, and maintenance of such aircraft, and machinery, equipment, and supplies primarily used to provide those services. (45) The fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised Code, if it is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given by the vendor to the consumer for a retail sale made in this state. (46) Sales by a telecommunications service vendor of 900 service to a subscriber. This division does not apply to information services. (47) Sales of value-added non-voice data service. This division does not apply to any similar service that is not otherwise a telecommunications service. (48) Sales of feminine hygiene products. (49) Sales of materials, parts, equipment, or engines used in the repair or maintenance of aircraft or avionics systems of such aircraft, and sales of repair, remodeling, replacement, or maintenance services in this state performed on aircraft or on an aircraft's avionics, engine, or component materials or parts. As used in division (B)(49) of this section, "aircraft" means aircraft of more than six thousand pounds maximum certified takeoff weight or used exclusively in general aviation. (50) Sales of full flight simulators that are used for pilot or flight-crew training, sales of repair or replacement parts or components, and sales of repair or maintenance services for such full flight simulators. "Full flight simulator" means a replica of a specific type, or make, model, and series of aircraft cockpit. It includes the assemblage of equipment and computer programs necessary to represent aircraft operations in ground and flight conditions, a visual system providing an out-of-the-cockpit view, and a system that provides cues at least equivalent to those of a three-degree-of-freedom motion system, and has the full range of capabilities of the systems installed in the device as described in appendices A and B of part 60 of chapter 1 of title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (51) Any transfer or lease of tangible personal property between the state and JobsOhio in accordance with section 4313.02 of the Revised Code. (52)(a) Sales to a qualifying corporation. (b) As used in division (B)(52) of this section: (i) "Qualifying corporation" means a nonprofit corporation organized in this state that leases from an eligible county land, buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements to the land that are part of or used in a public recreational facility used by a major league professional athletic team or a class A to class AAA minor league affiliate of a major league professional athletic team for a significant portion of the team's home schedule, provided the following apply: (I) The facility is leased from the eligible county pursuant to a lease that requires substantially all of the revenue from the operation of the business or activity conducted by the nonprofit corporation at the facility in excess of operating costs, capital expenditures, and reserves to be paid to the eligible county at least once per calendar year. (II) Upon dissolution and liquidation of the nonprofit corporation, all of its net assets are distributable to the board of commissioners of the eligible county from which the corporation leases the facility. (ii) "Eligible county" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (53) Sales to or by a cable service provider, video service provider, or radio or television broadcast station regulated by the federal government of cable service or programming, video service or programming, audio service or programming, or electronically transferred digital audiovisual or audio work. As used in division (B)(53) of this section, "cable service" and "cable service provider" have the same meanings as in section 1332.01 of the Revised Code, and "video service," "video service provider," and "video programming" have the same meanings as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. (54) Sales of a digital audio work electronically transferred for delivery through use of a machine, such as a juke box, that does all of the following: (a) Accepts direct payments to operate; (b) Automatically plays a selected digital audio work for a single play upon receipt of a payment described in division (B)(54)(a) of this section; (c) Operates exclusively for the purpose of playing digital audio works in a commercial establishment. (55)(a) Sales of the following occurring on the first Friday of August and the following Saturday and Sunday of any year, except in 2024 or any subsequent year in which a sales tax holiday is held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code: (i) An item of clothing, the price of which is seventy-five dollars or less; (ii) An item of school supplies, the price of which is twenty dollars or less; (iii) An item of school instructional material, the price of which is twenty dollars or less. (b) As used in division (B)(55) of this section: (i) "Clothing" means all human wearing apparel suitable for general use. "Clothing" includes, but is not limited to, aprons, household and shop; athletic supporters; baby receiving blankets; bathing suits and caps; beach capes and coats; belts and suspenders; boots; coats and jackets; costumes; diapers, children and adult, including disposable diapers; earmuffs; footlets; formal wear; garters and garter belts; girdles; gloves and mittens for general use; hats and caps; hosiery; insoles for shoes; lab coats; neckties; overshoes; pantyhose; rainwear; rubber pants; sandals; scarves; shoes and shoe laces; slippers; sneakers; socks and stockings; steel-toed shoes; underwear; uniforms, athletic and nonathletic; and wedding apparel. "Clothing" does not include items purchased for use in a trade or business; clothing accessories or equipment; protective equipment; sports or recreational equipment; belt buckles sold separately; costume masks sold separately; patches and emblems sold separately; sewing equipment and supplies including, but not limited to, knitting needles, patterns, pins, scissors, sewing machines, sewing needles, tape measures, and thimbles; and sewing materials that become part of "clothing" including, but not limited to, buttons, fabric, lace, thread, yarn, and zippers. (ii) "School supplies" means items commonly used by a student in a course of study. "School supplies" includes only the following items: binders; book bags; calculators; cellophane tape; blackboard chalk; compasses; composition books; crayons; erasers; folders, expandable, pocket, plastic, and manila; glue, paste, and paste sticks; highlighters; index cards; index card boxes; legal pads; lunch boxes; markers; notebooks; paper, loose-leaf ruled notebook paper, copy paper, graph paper, tracing paper, manila paper, colored paper, poster board, and construction paper; pencil boxes and other school supply boxes; pencil sharpeners; pencils; pens; protractors; rulers; scissors; and writing tablets. "School supplies" does not include any item purchased for use in a trade or business. (iii) "School instructional material" means written material commonly used by a student in a course of study as a reference and to learn the subject being taught. "School instructional material" includes only the following items: reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks, and workbooks. "School instructional material" does not include any material purchased for use in a trade or business. (56)(a) Sales of adult diapers or incontinence underpads sold pursuant to a prescription, for the benefit of a medicaid recipient with a diagnosis of incontinence, and by a medicaid provider that maintains a valid provider agreement under section 5164.30 of the Revised Code with the department of medicaid, provided that the medicaid program covers diapers or incontinence underpads as an incontinence garment. (b) As used in division (B)(56)(a) of this section, "incontinence underpad" means an absorbent product, not worn on the body, designed to protect furniture or other tangible personal property from soiling or damage due to human incontinence. (57) Sales of investment metal bullion and investment coins. "Investment metal bullion" means any bullion described in section 408(m)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, regardless of whether that bullion is in the physical possession of a trustee. "Investment coin" means any coin composed primarily of gold, silver, platinum, or palladium. (58) Sales of tangible personal property used primarily for any of the following purposes by a megaproject operator at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated: (a) To store, transmit, convey, distribute, recycle, circulate, or clean water, steam, or other gases used in or produced as a result of manufacturing activity, including items that support or aid in the operation of such property; (b) To clean or prepare inventory, at any stage of storage or production, or equipment used in a manufacturing activity, including chemicals, solvents, catalysts, soaps, and other items that support or aid in the operation of property; (c) To regulate, treat, filter, condition, improve, clean, maintain, or monitor environmental conditions within areas where manufacturing activities take place; (d) To handle, transport, or convey inventory during production or manufacturing. (59) Documentary services charges imposed pursuant to section 4517.261 or 4781.24 of the Revised Code. (60) Sales of children's diapers. (61) Sales of therapeutic or preventative creams and wipes marketed primarily for use on the skin of children. (62) Sales of a child restraint device or booster seat that meets the national highway traffic safety administration standard for child restraint systems under 49 C.F.R. 571.213. (63) Sales of cribs intended to provide sleeping accommodations for children that comply with the United States consumer product safety commission's safety standard for full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1219 or the commission's safety standard for non-full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1220. (64) Sales of eligible tangible personal property occurring during the period of a sales tax holiday held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code. (C) For the purpose of the proper administration of this chapter, and to prevent the evasion of the tax, it is presumed that all sales made in this state are subject to the tax until the contrary is established. (D) The tax collected by the vendor from the consumer under this chapter is not part of the price, but is a tax collection for the benefit of the state, and of counties levying an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.021 or 5739.026 of the Revised Code and of transit authorities levying an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.023 of the Revised Code. Except for the discount authorized under section 5739.12 of the Revised Code and the effects of any rounding pursuant to section 5703.055 of the Revised Code, no person other than the state or such a county or transit authority shall derive any benefit from the collection or payment of the tax levied by this section or section 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.125. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall not impose any penalty or interest under either chapter or take any action otherwise authorized under section 5739.30 of the Revised Code for the failure to file a return if no amount of tax is due with the return. Sec. 5745.04. (A) As used in this section, "combined tax liability" means the total of a taxpayer's income tax liabilities to all municipal corporations in this state for a taxable year. (B) Each taxpayer shall file a declaration of estimated tax report with, and remit estimated taxes to, the tax commissioner, payable to the treasurer of state, at the times and in the amounts prescribed in divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section. The first taxable year a taxpayer is subject to this chapter, the estimated taxes the taxpayer is required to remit under this section shall be based solely on the current taxable year and not on the liability for the preceding taxable year. (1) Not less than twenty-five per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or twenty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (2) Not less than fifty per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or forty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (3) Not less than seventy-five per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or sixty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (4) Not less than one hundred per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or eighty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the twelfth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (C) Each taxpayer shall report on the declaration of estimated tax report the portion of the remittance that the taxpayer estimates that it owes to each municipal corporation for the taxable year. (D) Upon receiving a declaration of estimated tax report and remittance of estimated taxes under this section, the tax commissioner shall credit ninety-eight and one-half per cent of the remittance to the municipal income tax fund and credit the remainder to the municipal income tax administrative fund. (E) The taxpayer shall make the remittance of estimated taxes electronically as prescribed by section 5745.041 of the Revised Code. (F) Notwithstanding section 5745.08 or 5745.09 of the Revised Code, no penalty or interest shall be imposed on a taxpayer if the declaration of estimated tax report is properly filed, and the estimated tax is paid, within the time prescribed by division (B) of this section, and no penalty shall be imposed if the taxpayer has not failed to properly file a declaration of estimated tax report in any preceding taxable year. Sec. 5747.09. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that the taxpayer estimates to be the taxpayer's combined tax liability under this chapter and Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code for the current taxable year. (2) "Tax liability" means the total taxes due for the taxable year, after allowing any credit to which the taxpayer is entitled, but prior to applying any estimated tax payment, withholding payment, or refund from another tax year. (3) "Taxes paid" include payments of estimated taxes made under division (C) of this section, taxes withheld from the taxpayer's compensation, and tax refunds applied by the taxpayer in payment of estimated taxes. (4) "Required installment" means a payment equal to twenty-five per cent of the lesser of the following: (a) Ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (b) One hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of a taxpayer for the preceding taxable year. Division (A)(4)(b) of this section applies only if the taxpayer filed a return under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code for the preceding taxable year and if the preceding taxable year was a twelve-month taxable year. (B) Every taxpayer shall make declaration of estimated taxes for the current taxable year, in the form that the tax commissioner shall prescribe, if the amount payable as estimated taxes, less the amount to be withheld from the taxpayer's compensation, is more than five hundred dollars. For purposes of this section, taxes withheld from compensation shall be considered as paid in equal amounts on each payment date unless the taxpayer establishes the dates on which all amounts were actually withheld, in which case the amounts withheld shall be considered as paid on the dates on which the amounts were actually withheld. Taxpayers filing joint returns pursuant to section 5747.08 of the Revised Code shall file joint declarations of estimated taxes. A taxpayer may amend a declaration under rules prescribed by the commissioner. A taxpayer having a taxable year of less than twelve months shall make a declaration under rules prescribed by the commissioner. The declaration of estimated taxes for an individual under a disability shall be made and filed by the person who is required to file the income tax return. The declaration of estimated taxes shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of April of each year or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the taxpayer becomes subject to tax for the first time. Taxpayers reporting on a fiscal year basis shall file a declaration on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of each fiscal year or period. The declaration shall be filed upon a form prescribed by the commissioner and furnished by or obtainable from the commissioner. The original declaration or any subsequent amendment may be increased or decreased on or before any subsequent quarterly payment day as provided in this section. (C) The required portion of the tax liability for the taxable year that shall be paid through estimated taxes made payable to the treasurer of state, including the application of tax refunds to estimated taxes, and withholding on or before the applicable payment date shall be as follows: (1) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (2) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the taxable year, forty-five per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (4) On or before the fifteenth day of the first month of the following taxable year, ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year. When an amended return has been filed, the unpaid balance shown due on the amended return shall be paid in equal installments on or before the remaining payment dates. On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month of the year following that for which the declaration or amended declaration was filed, an annual return shall be filed and any balance which may be due shall be paid with the return in accordance with section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. (D) In the case of any underpayment of estimated taxes, an interest penalty may be added to the taxes for the tax year at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (E) of this section. The amount of the underpayment shall be determined as follows: (1) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (2) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (3) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (4) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. The period of the underpayment shall run from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the date on which the payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently required to be paid to avoid any penalty. The tax commissioner may abate, in whole or in part, the interest penalty imposed under division (D) of this section. Any such penalty imposed shall be in lieu of any other interest charge or penalty imposed for failure to file an estimated return and make estimated payments as required by this section. (E) An underpayment of estimated taxes determined under division (D) of this section shall be due to reasonable cause and the interest penalty imposed by this section shall not be added to the taxes for the tax year if either any of the following apply: (1) The amount of tax that was paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during the year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due; (2) The amount of tax that was paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the taxpayer filed a return under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code for that year; (3) The taxpayer has not underpaid estimated taxes in any preceding taxable year. The tax commissioner may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of taxpayers after finding that the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. Sec. 5747.15. (A) In addition to any other penalty imposed by this chapter or Chapter 5703. of the Revised Code, the following penalties shall apply: (1) If a taxpayer, a qualifying entity, an electing pass-through entity, or an employer required to file any report or return, including an informational notice, report, or return, under this chapter fails to make and file the report or return within the time prescribed, including any extensions of time granted by the tax commissioner, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of fifty dollars per month or fraction of a month, not to exceed five hundred dollars, or five per cent per month or fraction of a month, not to exceed fifty per cent, of the sum of the taxes required to be shown on the report or return, for each month or fraction of a month elapsing between the due date, including extensions of the due date, and the date on which filed. (2) If a taxpayer fails to pay any amount of tax required to be paid under section 5733.41 or Chapters 5747. or 5748. of the Revised Code, except estimated tax under section 5747.09 or 5747.43 of the Revised Code, by the dates prescribed for payment, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding twice the applicable interest charged under division (G) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code for the delinquent payment. (3)(a) If an employer fails to pay any amount of tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and required to be paid under this chapter by the dates prescribed for payment, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the sum of ten per cent of the delinquent payment plus twice the interest charged under division (F)(5) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code for the delinquent payment. (b) If a qualifying entity or an electing pass-through entity fails to pay any amount of tax imposed by section 5733.41, 5747.38, or 5747.41 of the Revised Code and required to be paid under this chapter by the dates prescribed for payment, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the sum of ten per cent of the delinquent payment plus twice the applicable interest charged under division (G) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code for the delinquent payment. (4)(a) If an employer withholds from employees the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and fails to remit the tax withheld to the state as required by this chapter on or before the dates prescribed for payment, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding fifty per cent of the delinquent payment. (b) If a qualifying entity withholds any amount of tax imposed under section 5747.41 of the Revised Code from an individual's qualifying amount and fails to remit that amount to the state as required by sections 5747.42 to 5747.453 of the Revised Code on or before the dates prescribed for payment, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding fifty per cent of the delinquent payment. (5) If a taxpayer, a qualifying entity, an electing pass-through entity, or an employer files what purports to be a return required by this chapter that does not contain information upon which the substantial correctness of the return may be judged or contains information that on its face indicates that the return is substantially incorrect, and the filing of the return in that manner is due to a position that is frivolous or a desire that is apparent from the return to delay or impede the administration of the tax levied by section 5733.41, 5747.02, 5747.38, or 5747.41, or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code, a penalty of up to five hundred dollars may be imposed. (6) If a taxpayer, a qualifying entity, or an electing pass-through entity makes a fraudulent attempt to evade the reporting or payment of the tax required to be shown on any return required under this chapter, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of one thousand dollars or one hundred per cent of the tax required to be shown on the return. (7) If any person makes a false or fraudulent claim for a refund under this chapter, a penalty may be imposed not exceeding the greater of one thousand dollars or one hundred per cent of the claim. The penalty imposed under division (A)(7) of this section, any refund issued on the claim, and interest on any refund from the date of the refund, may be assessed under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code as tax, penalty, or interest imposed under section 5733.41, 5747.02, 5747.38, or 5747.41 of the Revised Code, without regard to whether the person making the claim is otherwise subject to the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 5733. of the Revised Code, and without regard to any time limitation for the assessment imposed by division (A) of section 5747.13 of the Revised Code. (B) For purposes of this section, the taxes required to be shown on the return shall be reduced by the amount of any part of the taxes paid on or before the date, including any extensions of the date, prescribed for filing the return. (C) Any penalty imposed under this section shall be in addition to all other penalties imposed under this section. All or part of any penalty imposed under this section may be abated by the commissioner. All or part of any penalty imposed under this section may be abated by the commissioner if the taxpayer, qualifying entity, electing pass-through entity, or employer shows that the failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter is due to reasonable cause and not willful neglect. (D) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or chapter, the tax commissioner shall not impose any penalty or interest under this chapter for the failure to file a return or report if no amount of tax is due with the return or report. Sec. 5747.43. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that a qualifying entity or electing pass-through entity estimates to be the sum of its liability under sections 5733.41 and 5747.41 or section 5747.38 of the Revised Code for its current qualifying taxable year or taxable year, as applicable. (2) "Tax liability" means the total of the taxes and withholding taxes due under sections 5733.41 and 5747.41 of the Revised Code or the tax due under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code for the applicable taxable year prior to applying any estimated tax payment or refund from another year. (3) "Taxes paid" includes payments of estimated taxes made under division (C) of this section and tax refunds applied by the qualifying entity or electing pass-through entity in payment of estimated taxes. (4) "Required installment" means a payment equal to twenty-five per cent of the lesser of the following: (a) Ninety per cent of the tax liability for the qualifying taxable year; (b) One hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of a qualifying entity or an electing pass-through entity for the preceding taxable year. Division (A)(4)(b) of this section applies only if the entity filed a return under section 5747.42 of the Revised Code for the preceding taxable year and if the preceding taxable year was a twelve-month taxable year. (B) In addition to the return required to be filed pursuant to section 5747.42 of the Revised Code, each qualifying entity or electing pass-through entity that is subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.41 and to the withholding tax imposed by section 5747.41 of the Revised Code or that is subject to the tax imposed under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code shall file an estimated tax return and pay a portion of the entity's tax liability for its taxable year. The portion of those taxes required to be paid, and the last day prescribed for payment thereof, shall be as prescribed by divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section: (1) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the entity's taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year; (2) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the entity's taxable year, forty-five per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year; (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the entity's taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year; (4) On or before the fifteenth day of the first month of the the entity's following taxable year, ninety per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year. Payments of estimated taxes shall be made payable to the treasurer of state. (C) If a payment of estimated taxes is not paid in the full amount required under division (B) of this section, a penalty may be added to the taxes charged for the qualifying taxable year or taxable year, as applicable, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (D) of this section. The penalty shall accrue at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the day the payment is made. The amount of the underpayment upon which the penalty shall accrue shall be determined as follows: (1) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (2) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (3) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (4) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. For the purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of a previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently required to be paid to avoid any penalty. The tax commissioner may abate, in whole or in part, the penalty imposed under division (C) of this section. Any such penalty is in lieu of any other interest charge or penalty imposed for failure to file a declaration of estimated tax report and make estimated payments as required by this section. (D) An underpayment of estimated taxes determined under division (C) of this section is due to reasonable cause if any of the following apply: (1) The amount of tax that was paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during that year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due; (2) The amount of tax liability that was paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year; (3) The amount of tax liability that was paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the entity for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the entity filed a return under section 5747.42 of the Revised Code for that year; (4) The taxpayer has not underpaid estimated taxes in any preceding taxable year. (E)(1) Divisions (B) and (C) of this section do not apply for a taxable year if either of the following applies to the entity: (a) For the immediately preceding taxable year, the entity computes in good faith and in a reasonable manner that the sum of its adjusted qualifying amounts or its qualifying taxable income, as applicable, is ten thousand dollars or less. (b) For the taxable year the entity computes in good faith and in a reasonable manner that the sum of its adjusted qualifying amounts or its qualifying taxable income, as applicable, is ten thousand dollars or less. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of Title LVII of the Revised Code to the contrary, the entity shall establish by a preponderance of the evidence that its computation of the adjusted qualifying amounts or qualifying taxable income, as applicable, for the immediately preceding taxable year and the taxable year was, in fact, made in good faith and in a reasonable manner. (F) The tax commissioner may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of qualifying entities if the commissioner finds the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. (G) Estimated taxes paid by a qualifying entity or an electing pass-through entity may be applied to satisfy the entity's tax liability under section 5733.41, 5747.38, or 5747.41 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section authorizes such an entity to apply estimated taxes paid against more than one tax. Sec. 5751.06. (A) Any taxpayer that fails to file a return or pay the full amount of the tax due within the period prescribed therefor under this chapter shall pay a penalty in an amount not exceeding the greater of fifty dollars or ten per cent of the tax required to be paid for the tax period. (B)(1) If any additional tax is found to be due, the tax commissioner may impose an additional penalty of up to fifteen per cent on the additional tax found to be due. (2) Any delinquent payments of the tax made after a taxpayer is notified of an audit or a tax discrepancy by the commissioner is subject to the penalty imposed by division (B) of this section. If an assessment is issued under section 5751.09 of the Revised Code in connection with such delinquent payments, the payments shall be credited to the assessment. (C) If the tax commissioner notifies a person required to register under section 5751.05 of the Revised Code of such requirement and of the requirement to remit the tax due under this chapter, and the person fails to so register and remit the tax within sixty days after such notice, the tax commissioner may impose an additional penalty of up to thirty-five per cent of the tax due. The penalty imposed under this division is in addition to any other penalties imposed under this section. (D) The tax commissioner may collect any penalty or interest imposed by this section in the same manner as the tax imposed under this chapter. Penalties and interest so collected shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed under this chapter. (E) The tax commissioner may abate all or a portion of any penalties imposed under this section and may adopt rules governing such abatements. (F) If any tax due is not timely paid in accordance with this chapter, the taxpayer shall pay interest, calculated at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code, from the date the tax payment was due to the date of payment or to the date an assessment was issued, whichever occurs first. (G) The tax commissioner may impose a penalty of up to ten per cent for any additional tax that is due under division (B)(2) of section 5751.051 of the Revised Code from a taxpayer incorrectly reporting its taxable gross receipts. (H) If the tax commissioner discovers that a taxpayer has billed or invoiced another person for the tax imposed under this chapter in violation of division (B) of section 5751.02 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall notify the taxpayer of the violation in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code and may impose a penalty of up to five hundred dollars. If the taxpayer subsequently bills or invoices a person for the tax imposed under this chapter, the tax commissioner shall impose a penalty of five hundred dollars. (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or chapter, the tax commissioner shall not impose any penalty or interest under this chapter for the failure to file a return if no amount of tax is due with the return. Section 2. That existing sections 323.121, 323.132, 323.31, 718.08, 718.27, 718.88, 718.89, 4503.06, 5703.42, 5703.52, 5703.60, 5703.70, 5717.01, 5717.011, 5717.02, 5721.011, 5726.21, 5739.02, 5745.04, 5747.09, 5747.15, 5747.43, and 5751.06 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. (A) The amendment by this act of sections 5717.01, 5717.011, and 5717.02 of the Revised Code applies to appeals filed on or after December 31, 2026. The enactment by this act of section 5717.021 of the Revised Code applies to petitioners or applicants who meet the criteria for filing an appeal under that section on and after that date. (B) The amendment by this act of sections 718.08, 718.88, 5726.21, 5745.04, 5747.09, and 5747.43 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. (C) The amendment by this act of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code applies on and after the first day of the first month beginning after the effective date of this section. (D) The amendment or enactment by this act of sections 718.27, 718.89, 5739.125, 5774.15, and 5751.06 of the Revised Code applies to returns or reports required to be filed on or after the effective date of that amendment or enactment. (E) The amendment by this act of sections 323.121, 323.132, and 5721.011 of the Revised Code applies to taxes charged and payable for tax years ending on or after the effective date of this section. The amendment by this act of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code applies to taxes charged and payable for tax years beginning on or after the effective date of this section.